Let’s use another example: let’s say that it is summer and the month of July. Summer is when it is supposed to be hot and humid. The human body responds by sweating to rid itself of excess moisture and to protect itself from the perils of the heat. Modern technology has produced ways by which the heat can be controlled or moderated with devices such as air conditioning for the heat of the summer, and oil and gas stoves for the winter. When a human responds to the energies of the seasons, those actions are physical, emotional, mental, and spiritual.
Do we need Codecs ?
Look at the first picture, without a cast-shadow shadow. While the object is beautifully rendered, it has no "place". It is a floating object without reference. This looks strange, because it is easy to see the dimensionality of the guitar and where the light is hitting it. The easiest way to "ground" our image is to add a cast shadow.
Deeper reflection helps us to discover the links between events that at first sight seem unconnected, to make evaluations, to analyze messages; this makes it possible to share thoughtful and relevant opinions, giving rise to an authentic body of shared knowledge. For this to happen, it is necessary to develop an appropriate environment, a kind of ‘eco-system’ that maintains a just equilibrium between silence, words, images and sounds."
They'll say all kinds of nasty things against it. They'll tell lies. They'll make you feel guilty for being interested in it.
But don't get so carried away that you forget to peel away the wax paper liner...
In the past decade, Malcolm Gladwell wrote three groundbreaking books that have contributed to the way we understand the world. They were The Tipping Point: How Little Things Can Make a Big Difference, Blink: The Power of Thinking Without Thinking, and Outliers: The Story of Success. All three became audiobooks and now all three are gathered together in a slipcased edition ($79.98) by Hachette Audio, unabridged on 22 CDs) read by the author. If you are in a mood to expand your mind or want to give a remarkable gift, this collection is ideal.
99. Although I should go to bed because I have early morning ZUMBA!!
could just looking at something and admiring it ever be an adequate substitute for owning it?
If true, AEY would have violated U.S. law that prohibits the acquisition of munitions from Chinese military companies.
WPA and WEP are forms of encryption technology that help to secure your wireless network. Your WEP settings can be changed or configured via the configuration webpage, this would be found under the basic setup tab.
I decided to use a bread mix the other day hoping that its helpful suggestions and corner cutting would end this bad luck. As my college students often say, it was an "epic fail". I followed the directions but the darn dough would not rise. In the end I had yet another bread brick.
so also in Christ shall all be made alive. Alleluia.
“My current thinking is that, given what the process needs is certainty and clarity, and what it suffers form is delay,” Schick said, “eminent domain would certainly inject a lack of clarity and... significant and substantial delay. So my current position is that, since it would just further some of the issues that came with the project and it would not solve any of those, it would not seem at first blush to make sense. But if the thinking changes I will certainly get in touch.”
Indeed, back in 2008 the Washington Post reported how 20,000 U.S. troops returning from Iraq would be stationed inside America under Northcom for purposes of “domestic security” from September 2011 onwards.
“Calm down, gibbering Earth-Man.” said Yurruch as he slowed the shuttle to docking speed. “Be sitting, all passenger folks.”
But to no avail
I have coloured this card with some of the Spectrum Noirs from Crafter Companion, and I'll say I think I'm defo a promarker girl, these pens are going to take a lot of getting use too.
he knows sound should be muted.
I find that I'm eliminating guys based on mispelled words...not typos, mispelled words.....and guys who consider reading a car & driver magazine 'reading'.
It's been busy around here with at least some garden prep and planting happening daily. In addition to the vegetable garden, I'm trying to set up a cutting garden, hoping to grow enough to provide flowers for my mom's bed and breakfast, in addition to our eggs.
What I took for simplistic writing in the first book turned out to be too simple the second time around. There was way too much telling and not enough description. I couldn't sympathize with Tris's pain because it was simply put: "It hurt."
I must find a home for photographs and old negatives, but that means cleaning out the craft cupboard too. Wait a minute…the desk has drawers! What’s in them? Jewellery junk, printer cartridges, tarot cards, old and nasty bill-letters-thingy-stuff SHUT YOUR EARS. Actually, I think two of them are empty…and, there’s another desk in the living room with empty drawers. I need to move stuff into those places. I don’t dare touch the bureau; that would take days to sort out.
The third test is happening right now. So far, so good, but I have trouble taking my eyes off him and off his breathing monitor. I know there are plenty of nurses around, but I am apparently a protective mama bird. While my husband keeps encouraging me to take a walk (I have not stepped outside the hospital for a week now), I need a little further proof that my son can breathe on his own before I leave his bedside.
… Probably contributing to Haslam’s unwillingness to sign the bill were the protests from state and national civil liberties, educational, and scientific groups, the editorials against the bill from the state’s major newspapers, and the petition effort organized by Larisa DeSantis of Vanderbilt University, which garnered thousands of signatures calling for a veto of HB 368.
Above it is an old wooden ironing board which also belonged to hub's grandmother, that is currently being used as a bulletin board, if you will.
A senior Fifa official has said he was "disappointed" by the number of World Cup tickets sold to fans in African countries.
I thought it would be nice to make a little cover to protect my book its ideal to carry down to the beach or while lounging around the pool (when I get time of course) I attached some ribbon in the seam so I could use it for my book mark.
While I was in the district of Wazi Zadran over in Afghanistan, I met a women who had come to the local American/Afghan military base. She had escort, but came on her own initiative, which is pretty unheard of for a woman. But her situation was desperate.
I say it because you, as a writer, should give yourself credit for how long you've been sticking with it. Because it's hard to stick with it. Not hard in the same way that it's hard to do emergency bypass surgery, no, but it's hard to put your proverbial heart on a platter and serve it to the proverbial wolves, again and again, and still maintain your public persona as reasonably positive and supportive. Of yourself, and others.
“the Lord Mayor in his robes and chain, and his entourage in medieval costume, outshines the royal party, which can dress up no further than service uniforms.”
Jaja
However, each day is a gift of extra life...... a bonus.
BehindtheSelectiveColoring…
Stories like this are what made me think of the Pepper song. Change the words just a tiny bit and you’d get …
Half Pints Brewing Company Humulus Ludicrous
The entries for my LBD contest are after the jump. This post will be updated as entries come in, so you can all see the competition, er, entries and know what your number is for the random number generater-draw-thing. If you decide you want to change your entry, you may up until the deadline. And you may want to check on your entry to be sure you sent me the right file etc.
I cut myself deeply while slicing
In an interview with a Chinese tabloid today, Lydia said Sun Xu is still ‘young’ and hence it is not unusual if he says the ‘wrong things’ at times.
Here's one I want to know: why do Patriots fans (and for that matter most of the northeast) hate Peyton and the Colts? Baltimore I can understand (although after stealing the Cleveland Browns their gripe is one of duplicitious hypocrisy), but Patriots fans? I mean the Pats have owned the Colts until recently, and went through the playoffs on Indy's backside. The national media certainly has annointed Brady as the superior QB, and why not? He's got 3 rings, Peyton hasn't even been in The Game. So what's to hate? The Colts are stocked full of classy players and coaches who's only sin with the media is generally not giving anything quotable or controversial.
Me: Jesus loves us so much that He died so we could be free from sin. He prays for God’s children and He watches over us.
Engagement photos: Sarah E Carter photography
In fact, he was given security after receiving “threatening” call for not demanding anything but just as a strange act of insanity by “anonymous” person !!!. Not only that, his decade-old beefed security was been beefed up for thespian Dilip Kumar after he received threatening telephone calls, again.
Are they not all ministering spirits, sent forth to minister for them who shall be heirs of salvation?
This was right opposite the Illustrators' Bar, where we seemed to start every day with a meeting over coffee. On Tuesday it was Kit Berry of Stonewylde fame. The other good friend, Anne Rooney, dashed off to collect her set of seven Vampire Dawn books (6 novels and a manual, Bloodsucking for Beginners) from the Ransom stand. It was publication day! These are for reluctant readers - no reason why they shouldn't have their own vampire series - and I'll be blogging about them when I've read them.
“Meanwhile, this could discourage many lenders from actively participating in the HARP program,” he added, “as HARP business could become less lucrative if rising prepayments lead to lower prices for pools backed by HARP collateral.”
Here's to the rapidly approaching Quad Dipsea race, the close of my 2010 season and the promise of 2011.
One of the best things about a small venue is that the artists are often milling about before and after a show. The Autograph Ninja takes full advantage of these situations by keeping watch on the bar. I spotted Marcus Foster before his set and managed to get a little one on one time with him. Before heading backstage, he was kind enough to sign the CD I bought in London.
Gondor Spearmen. Human Infantry – S 15cm – F d6 – D d6 – A 2 – M d6 – W 5 – P 6 – Special: Spears
In affiliated 15 Rainbow Ride, ride the carpeting all the way up to the Amphibian Mansion. Airing out of it and angle in the blah beyond in amid the Mansion Entance and the Lath Platform. you will be teleported to the top of the Red Bread Bewilderment or carnality versa. Be careful, on top of the Red Bread Maze, there is a 1-Up Augment but you can aswell be destroyed off by the wind.
for changing cliches
The kind of love the French really excel at is self-love. Their cuisine, their fashion and even their affected language are presented to the world as the apogee of human culture and achievement. In the jungle, this kind of boasting would immediately be seen the defensive posturing of a beta male. You don’t make big noises in front of your rivals unless you’re scared they might rub your face into their armpits.
I responded, "All the time, sweetie. All the time."
(and it looks ready)
I've used a Tilda stamp that I bought recently - she's called Hello Little Butterfly and I've had my eye on her for ages and finally gave in. She's coloured with promarkers and flexmarkers. The papers are Dovecraft, flowers are Wild Orchid, as is the little ribbon buckle. The lace is from The Stamp Basket, leaves were cut with a Stampin' Up die, sentiment is Cuddly Buddly, and everything else is from my stash.
It is a collection of loosely connected short stories featuring depressing people whose lives don’t really have anything to do with each other.
I will cover topics ranging from fitness competitions, to training at home, to nutrition and more. I encourage you to please share your comments, questions and topic suggestions.
Classic Belgian Brasserie' featuring a full selection of Belgian beers, boutique wines and spirits, and a select menu of traditional Flemish-French dishes, all served in an Art Nouveau inspired setting."
Mostly, it looks like spending some time watching a screen each day, and spending some time on other activities.
Don’t gag too loud darlings, I know it’s a crime.
(Hints for future charity runners - I wish more people had carried buckets – I had lots of pound and two pound coins with me to dish out but I only saw two buckets the whole time. I suspect there were other watchers who would have been similarly equipped. I also wish the other holder of a bucket had run on the kerb side of his group, not out in the middle of the roadway.).
This is more like it. It's Andrew Gold with Lonely Boy. He may never have been fashionable but Goldy knew how to bang out a catchy tune. Of course, he is currently suffering the handicap of being danced to by Legs and Co.
Terry Dowling
One more disturbing fact: when the police came to visit the Jordan home, to answer the many calls they received about the incident, here's what Mr. Jordan says happened:
Our constitutional monarchy is not, as republicans believe, on an interminable slide towards inevitable extinction; things have actually, apathetically perhaps, been on the up since the horrendous decade of darkness. The ten years that gave us Annus Horribilis, the spastic aftermath of the death of Diana and the constitutional shockwaves from Australia's attempt to secede from the Union, was not a decade in which we can look back with undiluted pleasure. Heck, even Windsor Castle almost burnt down.
6:00 PM: Torment hermit crabs
“Earlier this year, our film crew joined the international project “Speak Up for Human Rights! Use New Media!”. The cooperation of three organizations from Belarus, Germany and Ukraine allows young adults to acquire necessary know-how to realize human rights campaigns.
These things, among others, got me thinking, "why do women hate themselves so much? What is beautiful?"
Foreign Countries 0.7
We would like to see some form of lettering on your projects. This does not include using just a sentiment. The challenge is open from
JUAN DE G. RODRIGUEZ, ET AL., respondents-appellees.
The Six-year-old continued “Well, dogs already know how to do that, so they don't have to stay as long.''
That isn't to say that múm deserves any of the following labels: 1) poppy, 2) substanceless, 3) simple, 4) naive. Ah yes, their discography is riddled with moments of darkness and melancholy. It's just that these moments are presented through the scope of youthful optimism - perhaps a simple consciousness teetering on the fringe of maturity. For instance, "Asleep on a Train" pulses like the vague concept of an outlaw rattling around in a toddler's brain - and the concept is drowned to a hum (but still present) behind the immediate (self-involved) longing for a nap or a cup of hot chocolate for dessert. It's all backwards, and to great effect: the sweet simplicity's up front, but a pressing eeriness lurks somewhere right behind it. In fact, maybe that's the only way to summarize this music collective: everything they put out leans on a sorted of sleighted complexity, a situation or mood cast in a sideways light, always warm and inviting, and always accompanied with a heartbreaking wink of the eye.
Doodlecharms cart- pg 87 Mailbox 3 1/2" -- pg 86 Letter 1 1/4"
In the first place, nobody else but God would ever have thought of justifying those who are guilty. They have lived in open rebellion; they have done evil with both hands; they have gone from bad to worse; they have turned back to sin even after they have smarted for it, and have therefore for a while been forced to leave it. They have broken the law, and trampled on the gospel. They have refused proclamations of mercy, and have persisted in ungodliness. How can they be forgiven and justified? Their fellowmen, despairing of them, say, “They are hopeless cases.” Even Christians look upon them with sorrow rather than with hope. But not so their God. He, in the splendour of his electing grace having chosen some of them before the foundation of the world, will not rest till He has justified them, and made them to be accepted in the Beloved. Is it not written, “Whom he did predestine, them he also called: and whom he called he also justified: and whom he justified, them he also glorified”? Thus you see there are some whom the Lord resolves to justify: why should not you and I be of the number? (“All of Grace”)
Therefore the argument that there would have to be vast numbers of people involved in the cover up is not necessarily true.
6) - Brooklyn Empires, see Empire State
And of course, spending my days playing with this little peanut is what I do most of the time. Our pediatrician told us to start suicide-proofing the house today, yikes, I'm not ready for that!
But all geriatric hilarity aside, their chocolate custard with their salted almonds is probably my favorite dessert. Their custard is the creamiest cold confection, and the salt and crunch of the almonds, heaven.
“Also, there has been no audit of the UID project by an independent authority. The CAG should audit the entire process of creation of a people’s database,” Saraf said.
We make a humanly habitable world with stories. Every story, by engaging us in the how & why of events, is about power, & is itself a struggle for power. This will be a class about the stories we carry in our heads—on how to put them into words, to identify the elements of power: an experiment in imagining our way toward what might become the narratives of another possible world. I expect this will engage us in wide ranging discussions of politics and power in our lives, & in the world around us.
I've heard that one of the direct-to-DVD films bearing the same name is a remake, but I haven't heard too much about its' quality. Anybody seen it? If so, comment on the remake, and let me know if I should see it or not. My next film came in early(for once...), so the next movie will be a British thriller called The Hole. See you on the other side!
I have one that was taken with a cell phone camera...not the best..but I did tell you I would post one
It is also interesting to note the percentage of female activists on both sides. We feel it is important for women to take the lead in actively opposing anti-choice groups like SPUC as they are directly affected by the issue of abortion. On our side, we had a fairly even male to female ratio. The SPUC vigil, on the other hand, was overwhelmingly male. An interesting statistic (and one that adorned one of our placards) is that over 70% of pro-lifers are male, and 0% of those will ever be pregnant. Those men who turned out for the SPUC vigil on Saturday will never understand what it is like to go through an abortion or an unwanted pregnancy, and it’s high time they stopped using outdated religious dogma to try to guilt women into thinking they don’t have a choice in what they do with their own bodies.
By now it was around midnight, Paris time, and I was beginning to wilt. Much coffee was required to keep me on my feet till it was time to head to Once Upon a Crime, the bookstore where I was to give my talk. The store is owned by Pat and Gary, an amazing couple whose tiny, chaotic, book-filled shop is a must on the itinerary of any self-respecting crime writer on a US tour.
- Computer-based project (websites, PowerPoint presentations, etc.)
During my query research, I came across Avalon Publishing. I was very interested in them because they published clean books. I write Clean Historical Fiction/Romance so was anxious to submit to them and hear back.
I'm learning to let them fall to make room for the peace.
Rebel troops. Several of the Rebel troops break and run in a
Time travel! It's one of my favorite literary escapes. I had a hard time thinking up titles for this challenge, though, so I'm going the easy route and doing the lowest level.
... et le petit papillon vient de la nouvelle bordure papillon que je vous ai montrée hier...
we are all so proud of you.
The opportunity to address these issues as I have been tirelessly attempting to do, was ignored by those in policy roles in Washington DC. Those who have been reading The Ticker are well-aware of my efforts going back into 2007 and through the 2008 Presidential campaign on both sides of the aisle, along with my efforts since.
DEMS
When the United States fences youth exchange programs with prospective countries, it is worrying. When the United States fences a youth exchange program with Afghanistan, it is unnerving. But this year, the U.S. has quietly suspended the popular youth exchange which brought hundreds of Afghan high school students to small communities in the U.S. beginning in 2004. The reason? Fear of a dark future in Afghanistan was prompting too many of the students to bail out of the program and seek asylum elsewhere.
Starbase 10 was the fantasy/gaming shop specializing in Star Trek which occupied the building before the previous owners and Active Imagination, where all these guys met and still hang out. The owner of Starbase 10, the first to establish that as a gaming store many years ago, was my husband's squire in the SCA before he was knighted, and one morning he was here in a GREAT full costume, having stopped on his way somewhere else to show me his new Romanian hurdy-gurdy, when Joe and his brother came downstairs. "Do you want to see a hurdy gurdy??" I asked enthusiastically.
This was a great game for me back in the day. The comic look was cool and multiplayer was really fun, even if only two people were playing. The story was interesting and compelling. I would have finished the game, wouldn't it have been for a part in the game, where I had to hide and always got spotted, making me hate this game. Weird.
I will have more draft insight as the big night approaches.
Recently I was with my kids at their school lunch when a Standard One Child aged 7 sat down in front of my kids. He was alone and he had brought with him his big bag of lunch in a food warmer bag. I watched him unzip his insulated food bag then peer into the bag to find out the contents then saw his face light up in a big smile as he saw the many items his mother had packed for him.
One thing to keep in mind...
Later in the show, a kid dressed in ZZ Top attire -- black suit, hat, sunglasses, fake beard -- was invited up on stage to share the spotlight for a few minutes. Gibbons teased him, saying he had stolen his Halloween costume.
We can't wait to see our work come to fruition. If you enjoy experimental short film and would like to support us, here is a link with more info on what we are making:
“There, in the sky,” they answered, and all three boys pointed up toward the sky.
One day laying naked in the sun on our favorite clothing optional beach looking out on beautiful Sydney harbour and the next laying naked on the sand enjoying the sun and looking at the Indian ocean on the other side of Australia.
They only talked to me for nine minutes! They don't want me!
I have used 5" squares, a mix of vintage sheets and new fabric. 144 of them in total. I was totally inspired by Beata over at Rose hip who makes the most beautiful quilts with vintage sheets mixed with new designer fabric. You should really pop over there to have a peek. She also makes gorgeous pillowcases with a crochet trim that is to die for.
There are only two rooms in my home in which I'd have no problem going modern, and those would be the kitchen and the bathroom. I actually like kitchens that look clinical and a little antiseptic. Those 1930s kitchens that were white and chrome and spartan looking? I especially love those. But I'm starting to change my mind just a bit thanks to the photo above. It's a kitchen in Paris that was photographed in 1970. I think it's the most charming looking kitchen. This photo made me realize that I miss traditional, decorated kitchens.
You can buy any of these books through Amazon by clicking the linked titles above. If you end up getting any of them, feel free to come back here and share your thoughts.
regarding the process of match making .They are open to give their thoughts regarding it.
James Crooker
black ground pepper
I had a wonderful day celebrating being a mother! Truly being a mother is so amazing, better then I could have ever imagined. To have somebody love you, need you, want you, it's just wonderful! Ella is so big and she is a dream come true for this momma's heart. I never knew what my journey to motherhood would look like, I never knew what I would face as a mother. The fear of losing the little girl who really made my life feel worth while. Being Ella's mommy is perfect. The fear and pain that comes with being a heart mom is just a hint of this life compared to the JOY that radiates from her. Truly, I can honestly say, with my whole heart, that if I lose her, every single moment I would have gotten to spend with her would be worth it. I can't say what the rest of my life would look like, but no matter the future I am honored and blessed to be Ella Dawn's mommy. She is happy 99% of the time, she is ornery enough to be adorable and adventurous and obedient enough to earn my trust. She loves outside and all things girly. My wish as her mother is that I will help her reach her potential and help her to face this life that she has been given with an attitude of gratefulness and determination. Where she doesn't feel afraid to live, where she isn't afraid to die. I wish for her to know everyday is a gift, she is not better or worse then those who have a whole heart. She is loved by her maker, and He loves her dearly. The love I have the privilege of feeling towards my sweet Ella helps me trust God with her and my future. If He truly loves me the way the Bible says He does then the safest place we can ever be is in His will. I am human and I would die before I would purposely allow harm near Ella, how much more capable of Love is The perfect God who knows and created all? How grateful I am for that knowledge. Even though I will never grasp the depth of His love, just knowing it's more then my love for Ella let's me know it's enough. I hope you all had a wonderful mother's day celebrating! Never take being a mother for granted, it is a wonderful GIFT! Everyday should be lived to the fullest, make time to love on the little ones in your life, being a mommy certainly isn't the most glamorous job, and for Ella and I it is certainly not a job where I get to get out often, but the days are flying by and for me I love being a mommy every moment of everyday. Every sacrifice, every day that you spend in pj's, every time you miss a full nights sleep, every time you change a diaper, every time you clean up the same mess for the 5th time the same day, every time you read the favorite book again, it's all worth it, it's all a blessing, it's all important. I have seen too many mommy's with empty arms as the days were cut short. As my heart aches with each new loss I see nearly weekly it drives me to love Ella better. Not through fear of the future, but simply realizing the gift of today. Happy Mother's Day, may you Love deeper, this year as you enjoy the blessing of Motherhood!
Described as the hottest art work in the world right now, Christian Marclay’s The Clock is probably the closest cinema has ever come to representing real life in real-time in all its complexity.
"They went out from us, but they were not of us; for if they had been of us, they would no doubt have continued with us: but they went out, that they might be made manifest that they were not all of us." ~1John 2:19
Pours a deep brown. Moderate head that disappears making it look more like a Coke than anything else. Smells, I don't know, like a wanna' be stout. Tastes about the same. More hops than a brown should have, even an imperial, whatever that means for a brown. Otherwise it tastes like a slightly nutty standard stout.
SW Marine & 16th Ave – 9:27am
In 100 years, there will still be Africans in Africa. There will still be Asians in Asia. But the White race is set to be blended out of existence through mass 3rd-world immigration and forced assimilation.
There are NO Fancy-Schmancy coffee houses out in my pasture!
So, I tried to get on board. When I moved in October, I just stared at the new refrigerator. It was classy.
I dig around in the stash of paint sample cards pretty often, making little love notes for the kidlets’ lunches and that sort of thing.
One of the greatest joys I receive from quilting is gifting a quilt. Last week not one but two quilts were received by their recipients so I can now share them here.
During the daytime in autumn, the sun is very scorching, but at night, due to the clear moonshine, people get relief from the day’s fatigue. If a person takes shelter of Mukunda, or Kṛṣṇa, he can be saved from the fatigue of misidentifying the body with the self. Mukunda, or Kṛṣṇa, is also the source of solace to the damsels of Vṛndāvana. The damsels of Vrajabhūmi are always suffering because of separation from Kṛṣṇa. When they meet Kṛṣṇa during the moonlit autumn night, their fatigue of separation is also satiated. When the sky is clear of all clouds, the stars at night shine very beautifully; similarly, when a person is actually situated in Kṛṣṇa consciousness, he is cleared of all dirty things, and he becomes as beautiful as the stars in the autumn sky. Although the Vedas prescribe karma in the form of offering sacrifices, their ultimate purpose is stated in the Bhagavad-gītā: one has to accept Kṛṣṇa consciousness after thoroughly understanding the purpose of the Vedas. Therefore the clean heart exhibited by a devotee in Kṛṣṇa consciousness can be compared to the clean sky of the autumn season. During autumn, the moon looks very bright along with the stars in the clear sky. Lord Kṛṣṇa Himself appeared in the sky of the Yadu dynasty, and He was exactly like the moon surrounded by the stars, or the members of the Yadu dynasty. When there are ample blooming flowers in the gardens in the forest, the fresh, aromatic breeze gives a great relief to the person who has suffered during the summer and rainy seasons. Unfortunately, such breezes could not give any relief to the gopīs because of their hearts’ dedication to Kṛṣṇa. People in general might have taken pleasure in that nice autumn breeze, but the gopīs, not being embraced by Kṛṣṇa, were not very satisfied.
You were born to be abundant. Everything about you is abundant! Can you count the blood cells flowing in your body right this moment? The brain cells? The number of hairs on your head? OK so you’re bald, you have hair somewhere on your body, can you count those? You see you are filled with abundance in your very being. You take in millions of molecules of air every moment. You can think millions of thoughts in a year. You have millions of skin cells that regenerate moment by moment. You see, you are a walking bundle of wealth.
Isn’t that true with every unbeliever and this sinful world? As one continues in unbelief the conditions of evil increase. This truth is borne out in 2 Timothy 3:13. “But evil men and seducers shall wax worse and worse, deceiving and being deceived.”
i swear i did not pick these...
It may not be the sweeping change some have hoped for, but it is far and away the biggest step in the right direction we’ve ever seen from a US President.
So by the time my hubby finished the construction and I finished making the waffles (made more than was planned because everyone kept on eating them) it was almost 11 pm…Noy much of a relaxing evening. Thank Goodness it’s Friday folks!
Some have said it is strange that I still live in the same town where I grew up. Some would also say that it is strange that I attended a university in the same city where I grew up. Some would say that it is really strange that I work at the university I attended in the city I grew up. I say that it’s just me being true to myself and having a strong sense of personal pride.
Photos by Henrik Krogius
and even she had to admit that she was...
Please spare a few moments if you can and go visit Jessica's Blog, and don't forget to let her know you stopped by. Thank you so much Jessica for agreeing to be our GD for this challenge.
I'm a dumb shit.
boots Vagabond
Therefore, I suggest that any student to make some effort trying to know students from countries, if your English is not good enough, this is an opportunity for you to learn, if a person don’t bother to make effort to overcome challenges, why bother to go oversea to study? Better just stay at home country and study.
Since my last post, I have to say that my life did a little shimmy to the left with a kick in the crotch followed by Ta-Dah with jazz hands. In other words, while it hasn’t been all fun and games, sometimes it takes a jolt to reconfigure priorities and to get some perspective.
69 ***5. “What’s Wrong With George Anastaplo? Another Lecture for Law Students.” Carterville Herald, Carterville, Illinois, November 19, 1964, p. 1; December 3, 1964, p. 2; December 10, 1964, p. 2. (Source: Item D-V/14/1963, below. Incorporated in Item B-2, above, pp. 105-14 (1975).) See Item C-1986(3), below.
“Ooh…I like squats!”
An analogy: Any serious and sincere ‘rehabilitation’ expert who has helped individuals to rehabilitate themselves from a life of crime and drugs, like Delancey Street has; can tell you that you cannot help anyone addicted drugs, until they themselves have hit rock bottom, to such a horrific extent, that they finally get slapped in the face with their problem, and decide they are serious about needing help to help themselves.
In preparation for this undertaking, I went out the other day and picked up some yeasts to get me on my way. Here is what I got:
*red colored pencil
I cant do this by myself
will go away and feel sad now :(
Today’s efficiency situation:
Sat on the mac
Maybe because I was lucky enough to have such great parents, I was late in getting to that place a lot of adoptees get to – wanting to find out about my birth family. Of course, I had wondered occasionally from the time I was quite small, mostly about my birth mother. What does she look like? Does she ever think about me? And of course the big question: Why did she give me up?
Blackadder: "It was complete bollocks"
As a mobile games console, the PS Vita has no equal. Games look amazing, and that’s what’s important here.
Okay, yesterday I told you why I leave forums.Today I will write about how I pick a forum!
10 - Ice Machine (Cover)
I can only chalk this problem (& snag in my shopping) to my European experience. I had no storage space. My freezer was itty-bitty. My fridge - ridiculously little. I couldn't buy in bulk. I had no where to put anything more than what we needed in the very near future. All storage space I did have was filled with OTC medication smuggled into the country from summer holiday journeys to Costco (ironic?) Although I now have more storage space than is necessary and more cold storage than I could imagine filling, I just could figure out why I would want so much of all these things. My mind couldn't get off the fact that "I could always go get more if I ran out and needed more. Crazy women! Crazy women! Crazy women!
And Bridget’s about to learn that, sometimes, saying you’re sorry just isn’t enough.…
If you were in the market for a new TV and had £17,000 to spend, we guess you'd want something 3D, HD and with a bigger screen than we've got walls.
This years conference theme is Jesus. One word: Jesus. It’s a big subject.
Verdict: Read this in storytime to a variety of ages, take it on school visits, and listen to the laughter explode. Highly recommended.
This is a really really late post! All photos are from last last wednesday! :-) I've been a really sloppy blogger. Hahaha. Well anyway, Just for a day, I wanted to wear something un-dainty. Because I've been in florals and lace on a roll these past months. So just once, a breath of fresh air. Hahaha.
The UK has been one of the preferred destinations in Europe for high profile Chinese government and private sector investments. CIC took many people by surprise in 2009, when it became one of the largest shareholders in Songbird Estates, the majority owner of Canary Wharf, a major business district in London, and one of its two main financial centres – the second being the city of London, also known as the ‘square mile’. The investment served to bail out the property company, giving CIC the third largest equity stake in the process. A more recent investment by CIC has been the purchase of 8.7% stake in Thames Water from two Iberian investors, as reported in the Daily Telegraph in January this year.
As she carefully lifts him out of his cosy bed to offer him a teated bottle, volunteer Viviana explains: “Animal trafficking is the third largest illegal trade in the world, after weapons and drugs.
Did he ever. I’m not sure I can even express what it is that he accomplished.
I asked M from the beginning if she's ok with having display cake and having the real cake in the back, not for budget reason though because having it this way is more expensive, but it serves a couple of advantages:
I picked another restaurant, and while we were driving there I called to see if they had any availability for the evening…and they didn’t. So, options number three it was! (third time is the charm). 1001 Food and Drink.
Chapter 8 of Daniel occurs in Belshazzar’s third year of reign about 547 B.C.
The small greetings in the set fit on the balloon and the square sign. They also fit perfectly on the round tab punch, tag punch, and several Cuttlebug Die tags. Long greetings fit in the word window (punch twice to make it longer) or look terrific stamped on ribbon.
Ironically, perceptions of attractiveness aren’t necessarily linked to images we see in the media.
All this means you'll spend a long time licking your chops in anticipation. Much longer than you anticipated, in fact.
ARE THEY OUT OF THEIR MINDS? What kind of military is this? They ACTUALLY let him see his son after everything he’s done? I mean, he’s only an escaped mental patient locked up for doing dangerous experiments on human beings. It’s not like he’s, oh I don’t know, CRAZY or anything, right? This makes no sense! What kind of military organization would ever negotiate with a hostage like this? What do they gain? Brownie points for reuniting a son and his father, even though the father is a known lunatic and could do anything to activate his son’s Hulk persona and sabotage everything the military themselves is working for? Are they just TRYING to screw up as much as possible? Is that the experiment they're doing; how to royally mess up everything as much as possible? I’m sorry, I don’t get it, and this movie has officially crossed the line into complete WTF territory, never to return. Movie, YOU NEED HELP.
James Murdoch’s chief lobbyist, Frédéric Michel, communications with News Corp reveal Jeremy Hunt’s cosy relationship with the company and a bias in favour of their £8 Billion pound BskyB takeover bid:
Thankfully, the bees seem to be in abundance around New York’s inner cities. Since most people there like to stuff themselves with pretzels, hot dogs, and pizza, the bees are carving out a nice home for themselves wherever they can find it. Seems like a just punishment for the city that gave us the second most horrible accent in the country, IMO. While we do have this type of native bee in California, it doesn’t seem like we need to start wearing full body suits just yet.
colonels of the US Air University in
next time, right?
‘Viola my chaser, monsewer,’
If I could build myself a time machine (and believe me, it wouldn’t be in an old Delorian, but probably a toilet, one with flashing lights and smoke that comes out the back when the flux capacitor gets turned on), I would zip back in time (which is all you can ask for a time machine really) and give my younger self some much needed advice.
AEI, Oil & Gas, Deals By Region, 2006 to YTD 2012 6
Prior to the arrival of Europeans on this continent, there were human beings who lived here that loved the Milwaukee River. They were indigenous peoples called the Menominee, Potawatomi, and Fox, among other tribes. The lives of these human beings were firmly intertwined with the life of the river. These human beings ate and drank from the river, prayed to the river, and listened to the river’s wisdom.
4. Identifying people that I would like to share it with.
Is it fun to watch? Yes. Is there anything particularly interesting about it? No, not unless you count the subtle attempt to mirror the mummy to the hero, played, of course, by the great Peter Cushing. The mummy has a slow, painful gait. So does Cushing.. His is the result of suffering a broken leg which was not set properly. But the dichotomy does not go any deeper than that, so whatever the filmmakers were aiming for, they missed as far as I am concerned. Perhaps a wiser head than mine can decipher the nuance.
We spent the rest of New Years day at Grandpa and Grandma Millen's playing board games and snacking. Gabriella took a power nap at her request ;)
Anybody having trouble getting their workouts in? Any new DVDs or exercise programs I should know about?
We are once again joined by Donna our Guest Designer for the month of December and the rest of Team Fi so check out the inspiration below.
As I'm wont to do, I was browsing a seller's list on Ebay at some point last year and stumbled across this curiously named cassette. Did a quick Google query and learned BHtL were a mid-80s hardcore outfit from Eau Claire, WI, and with the few pertinent matches I was able to conjure up, they were sometimes mentioned in the same breath as Husker Du, Breaking Circus and Big Trouble House. Nice. Naturally intrigued, I placed my bid and won, but didn't get to listening to it until this past week, nor did I take a closer inspection of the liner notes beforehand. It turns out that this affair was engineered by Steve Björklund of Breaking Circus renown. The plot thickens. Lead Lobster Phil Harder would join Björklund and Co. for their Smokers Paradise ep in 1987, not long after this tape was recorded.
This leads me to more of my constant thinking about my “self,” as opposed to “myself” (which I do, also). This lifetime of contemplation I have always thought must be related to my TLEpilepsy which affects me (and my comrades) with an aura of dissociation. However, I think perhaps it is simply what I do as part of my quest to find (oh, I wish I had a better way of putting this) “the meaning of life.”
VO: The crowd is awesome, everyone is having a wonderful time and it's a candy colored kaleidoscope of fun with my friends.
The first stop was Meadville, Pennsylvania -- north of Pittsburgh, and just south of Lake Erie -- which is the home of Allegheny College.
But the decision has been made, our new team members are:
Our products range entails broadly to waterproofing, concrete repair, floor coatings, anti corrosive coatings and sealants. Most of our products distinctly have atleast two to three characteristic properties that make them stand out amongst the competition. We believe in being “best in class” in all categories where we are present. Installation of these products is also technically backed by inputs from our in-house contracting division, thereby guaranteeing our customers a reliable and durable system.
Hope turned 12 on June 24th. It's hard to believe it's been 12 years since she was a baby in my arms. But it's true, and believe me she won't let me forget it!
MORLY GREY – WHO CAN I SAY YOU ARE
They wrapped her up and gave her to Chris, and from that point on she was with us the entire time (minus a few minutes for a hearing check the next day). Since my arms weren't strapped down, I was able to semi-hold her and touch her, and even managed to take a few pictures of her and Chris. We had the anesthesiologist take our first family picture. Contrary to the pictures below, she was wide awake and sucking on her fist something furious most of the time. Girl came out wanting a three course meal!
affection and need as any clinging barefaced lout
With so many to care for, they can’t stay to chat,
We all go through things; good and bad. Obviously, I'm having a few bad moments lately (if you hadn't noticed!) but it will get better. I look around and see other people going through far worse situations than I am but they are taking them on with a smile. My mishaps might be small potatoes in the grand scheme of life but in my life they feel like big, fair-prize winning baked potatoes! Today I'm going to start following some other people's lead- I am going to acknowledge my sad moments but I am going to smile and move on. Choose Joy! Tonight, I am having a party with my girlfriends and it is going to be a great day. Each day we are given the great opportunity to start all over again. I started fresh today and I hope you all have a wonderful day!
Judge Christopher Batty in December sentenced Jallat to five years detention and Shahzada to four. He lifted a media ban on reporting the boys’ identities because of the severity of the attack.
I haven't been clothes shopping with Austin in a long time. I usually just pick up jeans and bring them home for him while I'm out shopping. Now I remember why.
"We’ll take more care of you"- British Airways-
In France, the story that keeps coming back is about Freemasons. It’s everywhere. Most big French magazines run at least one big Freemason cover a year. Books dissect the “state within a state,” to borrow from a recent title. Blogs abound.
1. Write a post describing last night's shenanigans (which I did in Turning 37, Taking Smaller Steps, and Smiling-- if you are remotely interested in my interactions with different types of salsa partners, you should read it!)
Mudenge was accused of imposing candidates after he insisted on holding the elections without those from the Mujuru camp. The Mujuru faction alleged that it had been agreed that the DCC elections would be suspended for some time to allow the leadership to agree on a number of outstanding issues.
Bag is on lap. Along comes a bump. Car jumps.
Every time I write something about the resiliency of TV, I get very predictable comments from knuckleheads who think they understand young people and want to explain their behaviors to me.
Stevia is free of calories and carbohydrates, so it's great for dieters, people with diabetes and candida issues and for those who simply want to avoid sugar.
Red meat and dark poultry tend to be good sources of iron (however, I believe you do not need to eat meat to have sufficient iron levels, you just need to be more conscious). Many endurance athletes eat carbohydrate rich diets that have lower levels of meat or other iron sources.
Does anyone have any tranquilizers I can borrow until kindergarten starts in the fall???
- The following day, I brought the fruit to room temperature, sprinkled on the frozen crumble topping and put it in the oven to bake.
Black journaling pen (Zig Millennium)
The SKA-project promises to answer some of the most fundamental questions about the evolution of the universe, including the emergence of the first stars and galaxies. It will be so sensitive that it will be able to detect an airport radar on a planet 50 light years away. In other words, it will be capable of probing back into time, to places that existed billions of years ago… Truly astronomical, I tell you!
What happened to that? To writing for fun?
This has been a great way to raise funds towards my costs and also to help me in making a big cash donation to Alzheimer’s Australia NSW.
I won't try and paint this as a positive, but if you want to persuade top bosses about the risks of not taking climate change seriously, given the above, here's a simple way to do it: Educate them on weather risk.
SPRING! - Can I say how happy I am that spring has been with us for close to an hour already? I feel like I've made it through one more winter! And Peeps are out. YUM!
The main problem was they weren't honest about it.
I am no longer neglecting you, blogger!
"I wanna be a paleontologist too," he said.
BLISS, in Russian looks like this.....
Allow cake to cool for 10 minutes in pan and then remove from pan to let cool on a wire rack for a bit.
For the base I used a pre-cut card from Close to my Heart. They come with matching envelopes as well.
In Trinidad, things go at their own relaxed pace. Here is a collection of my time lapses taken during Carnival 2012. Mainly in Port of Spain and one at Maracus Beach. I hope to do a more in depth one next time I’m there.
The best way regularly are you presently in a position to place any carrier in close proximity to to the road, possess instant fall-in-love covet, speedily go to where you can research search engines for instance the major search engines the item And pay attention to out and about it's very affordable? Almost never. That is exactly why this Cambridge Updwardly cellphone Satchel ($$156 : $187) ought to obtain for each single and each and every with each girl' desire a declaration this kind of holidays.
The following is a four page list of quotes by famous individuals that reflect their knowledge of Government, Banking, Military, and Media control – or otherwise known as the “New World Order.”
Pimento cheese is the Pate' of the South.
07 Two of a Kind
3. Matthew and Luke do not tell the same story; Mark and John don’t tell it at all.
Well, more power to us humans. I like having a Creator I can outwit. Beats being a pet. I'm glad it was Azathoth and not Odin.
Someone should have said something to the younger man who was so impatient. He should have understood why the elderly woman was clinging on to the conversation with the young teller. It was probably more than a reminder of her children. More likely, it was a reminder that she had not seen them or talked to them in quite some time.
When Brooklyn was a collection of small villages and farms connected by a handful of rustic roads, journeying through one end of Kings County to the other was no small undertaking, and taverns and inns were welcome respites during the trek.
Records. first one goes first and returns happy: ive really got the
Pelt is also a bit of an oddity in drone music in that they were one of few
- No one else’s feelings matter if you don’t get what you want. This includes your little brother who has caused all of the worlds injustices because he cannot reach the upper kitchen cabinets to help unload the dishwasher.
10 Definite Don'ts Of Great Hair Care
One of D&D's most feared, campaign breaking, artifacts is none other than the Deck of Many Things. Some DM's refuse to use it in their campaign because of the incredibly drastic swings the individual cards can cause. Some of them even remove characters completely from the campaign until another high powered piece of magic is put to the task of reversing the harm done.
9.Be professional.
-do all the finishing work inside (trim, odds and ends)
Still simple, of course, just make these two changes to the mix instructions, and frost!
“Don’t step inside it and count to three, spinning so that your skirts fly.”
Today Doug and I audited the Ingrid Klimke clinic in Truro that Joanne Dustan (Nova Scotia Dressage) organized. We're so lucky to have the quality of clinicians she brings in, here in Nova Scotia. Last year she brought in Steffen Peters - can you believe it?
He's my best friend.
Next were the layers...more batting, muslin and the chosen fabric. Careful planning for how the fabric pattern would land on this cornice was a must. The pattern appears very geometric but is in fact a more random, loose, hand done design, making this step very important. We made sure that both valences had the same pattern at the center point so that even though they are different sizes, the pattern placement is the same.
Maybe I’m being too hard on him. No, it’s time to deliver King James.
If your a BNP or UKIP voter, I will urge you to use Boris Johnson as your second preference.
Maybe my feet aren't cut out for heels.
I'm really on a roll in 2008 - I think I would like it if in the next movie I watch, no one dies violently.
“Here are the chairs, how many do you need?’ said the owner.
Would the poor brave and loyal Nishada, Ekalvya have lost his thumb and his skill if not for Drona’s love and pride in Arjuna?
reasons. Impulse and effect
So after much much prayer and curriculum hunting, we have decided to go with My Father's World. I'm hoping we can order the curriculum in the next week or so. I'm looking forward to getting started with it. It seems to incorporate the Charlotte Mason/Classical learning that I find so beneficial, which makes me happy!
Much of it is relatively small in the grand scheme of things ..
OK, OK...hit by pitch. But at least I was showing up to the plate.
Meanwhile his wife Najat Chaffe and her six children still live in their Shepherds Bush home, netting £680 a week in ­benefits.
"If I had a penny for every time I've been asked that, well not that pennies are of any use to me, but still. No. I'm not an angel. But I am the one who's here to take you to the angels."
Sadly, the vast majority of people never take the time to “look behind the curtain” to see how things really work. If they did, they might find themselves extremely upset about what they would find.
Paper: Memory Box: Viola which is the first paper pad in a long time to come out with pretty purples!
Unfortunately, they are immediately imprisoned, for the ladies' Queen Yllana (Laurie Mitchell) who rules Venus with an iron hand, a jeweled mask and a deep-seeded hatred of men...has every deep-seeded suspicion that these big dumb Earth oafs will pollute Venus with their big dumb Earth selves.
Also, Andy was more subtle than the nun had been, or at least story telling techniques had been refined somewhat in the two decades since she had told her story. Unlike in the Holy sister's Budapest fantasy, which limited investigation, even in a pre-internet age could disprove, Andy did not suggest that the dismembering of live Africans took place in a public square, or was openly sanctioned by the Apartheid government, however, he assured us that it was happening daily behind closed doors in prisons across South Africa.
You have to spend money to make money
He returned his attention to the polite gentleman and said, “You MUST engage!”
Around 50 residents have already signed a petition stating: “It is highly likely that there would be no peaceful, integrated or meaningful co-existence between the proposed site occupants and the existing local population.”
5. In Greek poetry, the lily stood for tenderness, and there is a Greek myth that tells us how the lily was born from the milk of the goddess Hera.
Surely, I'm reaching some sort of limit.
Being petite isn’t fun. Plain and simple. Its more money. Its time and patience. Being 5’0 tall has its perks, but when it comes to fashion it can be a hassle. Maxi dresses clearly were not made for short people like myself. Last summer, I tried on a beautiful purple maxi dress in Macy’s. It looked something like this.
Remember what it says?
On the other other hand, I basically don't care about Gelato guy.
There was the ‘bokdo’ (goat), ‘tal’lo’ (sardine), ‘combo’
In a little less than 2 weeks, we will be having her birthday party at our house. It will be a family party, so no huge event planning is needed. But we have had the hardest time coming up with a theme. Last year, we did an Arts and Crafts Party, and it was really awesome. I want to come up with something as fun and cool as that. I think I finally might have a good one, but I need to run it by Londo before announcing.
Are you a creative Infomaniac Bitch?
“Who are you?”
Our hero--known to us as Troy--travels in time to preserve the Perfect Present in which he lives. His job is to preserve the disasters of the past that have ultimately led to the wonders of the future. Right now he watches over the series of events leading up to The Great Conflagration--the event immediately prior to the establishment of the perfect world in which he lives. His previous stint was preserving the integrity of the holocaust.
The same was true for cleaning. I don’t want to bring dirty stuff into my beautiful new house! So I was cleaning each item as I was packing it away. Now I have 5 days before The Agent wants to move, I have kids crying at my ankles, and I am too busy to take time off from work. I need to get the stuff done this weekend.
Who can free himself of achievement and fame
By Jenna-Lynne Duncan
I gave my scales the finger this morning.
“Girl With a Pearl Earring,” painted around 1665, was last seen in the United States in 1995 at the National Gallery of Art in Washington, D.C., in a 21-picture exhibition focused solely on Vermeer.
Please stop by Beverly’s at How Sweet the Sound for a wonderful variety of pinks. There’s art, beautiful vintage dish and glassware, gorgeous gardening and wonderful recipes for lots of inspiration. You will not be disappointed. Happy Pink Saturday everyone!
after Scrapfest! and I was only there for the day!
I pondered his point, searching for a philosophic, esoteric, universal, transcending explanation to this query.
Joe beat Morgan with a Figure Four, and made Matt tap out. Joe needed this win, and now perhaps we will see one more match between these two big men?
I ripped the notice down and used it to wipe the sand from my feet. And then a thought struck. A horrible, no-good, bad thought. The newspaper. They published my name with each intent to foreclose. That meant others would know where I was. Others, as in people I owed. Bad people.
Please send application with a comprehensive CV, a recent photograph, copy of certificate and academic transcript and kindly mark code of the position applied at the email subject - to email address :
anything that catches my interest is good. Of course I like some more than others. Since I'm Mormon I don't watch or read what others normally would. I don't really want to be exposed to those kinds of things though anyways. A favorite series at the moment would be Harry Potter. I just finished it for the first time a few weeks ago!
Would you like to rule here or there?
Also, my sister-in-law went into labor yesterday (or last night... I forget; it's Saturday morning at 4:30AM as I type this up), so I've been busy with all the baby-stuff - baby proofing, buying clothes/cribs/whatever we didn't get from the baby shower, etc. I BARELY just got home from the hospital because my brother figured I may as well come back when she is actually in the process to give birth. When I left, they had just given her an epidural and she's barely 4cm, so the nurse told us that we'd probably have an late morning/early afternoon birth (on Saturday). So, why am I not sleeping, since I just spent almost 12 hours in the hospital, you ask? Oh, cause I didn't want to leave my blog so empty for so long. xD Plus I've never missed IMM three weeks in a row.
Garcia de Codes A, Arrazola MP, de Juanes JR, Sanz I, Jaen F, Lago E. Vacunación frente a la gripe en trabajadores de un hospital general. Estrategias para incrementar su cobertura. (Influenza vaccination in healthcare workers. Strategies to achieve compliance in a general hospital.) Med Clin (Barc) 2004; 123: 532-534.
This board and batten headboard is gorgeous. I am amazed at what a little molding can do to a space.
This post will stay on top until December 23, 2011 at 11:59PM my time
"It has head-to-tail length of 97–137 cm (38–54 in), a wingspan of 167-201 cm (66-79 in) a height of 115–138 cm (45–54 in) and a weight of 2.1–3.3 kg (4.6–7.3 lb). Notable features include slaty flight feathers, red-brown thighs, and a paired red-brown and black stripe up the flanks; the neck is rusty-gray, with black and white streaking down the front; the head is paler, with a nearly white face, and a pair of black plumes running from just above the eye to the back of the head. The feathers on the lower neck are long and plume-like; it also has plumes on the lower back at the start of the breeding season. The bill is dull yellowish, becoming orange briefly at the start of the breeding season, and the lower legs gray, also becoming orangey at the start of the breeding season. Immature birds are duller in color, with a dull blackish-gray crown, and the flank pattern only weakly defined; they have no plumes, and the bill is dull gray-yellow." (Wikipedia)
Change can only happen if we truly believe it to be possible. So I need to start believing in myself don’t i? And i need to read my large collection of self help books…. I wish there was an easy way, I wish i could click my fingers and be one of those happy, smily people everyone wants to be. I have one of those as a friend, I wished she lived closer so her positivity could rub off on me! Ah well.
Bolton said Obama’s foreign policy is “confused”. President Obama’s foreign policy is certainly different from neocon foreign policy. Take wars for example:
Saturday, April 24, 2010
The night before we left, the temperature at my parents house was -27°F. MINUS!!
Hello everyone I hope everyone had a great Holiday! I wanted to mention that Jacque at Jacque Jolie De ViVre has a great give away on her blog. "Flexmarkers Sweet stuff" She has a awsome cards. I also want to memtion that I got my catalogs for Close To My Heart and they are awsome! So give me a hollar if your interstead or you can also check out my website.
Roll into 3 logs and chill at least 1-2 hours.
A cattleman that’s who. Someone I’ve known since he was 6. His father, also a rancher was and is a friend. His classmates at Harvard called him a cow farmer. They were rather surprised when the profs picked him as their assistant, telling him as a Montanan, he was there for the bottom of the curve. All that was 25 years ago but bicoastal arrogance hasn’t changed about flyover country as far as I can tell.
8. Learning Doesn’t Stop When You Graduate – Learning is a life long endeavor. The minute you stop learning is the minute you cede opportunities to others. Always look to challenge and refine your thinking. View everything through the lens of learning. Life is about learning and unlearning, and developing and growing. Don’t waste your experiences – view them as learning opportunities.
8oz pkg neufchatel or cream cheese, (not the whipped kind)
You know, it’s one thing to attribute every death that happened in the USSR over a given period to communists (that’s usually how you get these insane figures), but to add people to the population pool?
Right, now you have a chapter by chapter outline of the book and from that you can pick out the important aspects to go in the synopsis. While doing this, don’t forget that you need to entice the synopsis reader, so make sure you include plenty of conflict and show how the story and characters are driven as a result.
I'm sure you'll join me in wishing Tams a steady recovery, from the progress reports she's doing amazing!!! :D
“… there are not two rule books – the physics of the large and the physics of the small – but only a single rule book for all of life.“
curtailing his sporting career,
*The rhyme scheme is ABaAabAB
When the fries are finished baking, transfer to a paper-towel lines plate to drain some of the grease. Season with additional salt and pepper to taste. Serve warm.
and then I won’t even NEED a driving license,
This book is an insightful, hilarious look at what's wrong with advertising agencies, with marketing in general, and maybe even the world overall. But it isn't just for people who work in ad agencies. It's for anybody who ever saw an ad that sucked and wondered how it got that way. It's for anybody who works in any kind of job involving generation of new ideas. And yes, it's for anybody who enjoys "Mad Men." Bob Hoffman is smarter than Don Draper. He's funnier than Don Draper. And he's better looking than... Okay, like I said, Bob Hoffman is definitely smarter and funnier than Don Draper.
Stan Getz – Saxo Tenor
The finished size of this card is 4-1/2" x 6-1/2" to accomodate all those great oval layers! I have used LOTS of Die-namics on this card - the butterfly from Notched Tag Die-namics, new Photo Corners Die-namics, Bracket Tab Die-namics for the sentiment, new Royal Rose Die-namics (cut from Bubblegum felt), new Mini Monarch Border, new Oval STAX sets 1 & 2 Die-namics, and the Oval Open Scallop Doily Die-namics! I also have some gorgeous lace from The Ribbon Carousel tucked under the Mini Monarch Border. Here is a look at the inside.
Till the work be done.
5) Take walk after dinner /lunch a bit
Ahn also says, “As the prince tries to solve the mystery, you’ll be able to see the series’s strong plot.”
To have faith that God is using the suffering for a greater good.
This pattern was evident at the FeelGood kiosk last week when we featured the ‘PB and Gender,’ a sandwich containing nutella, peanut butter, and banana slices.
D = Determination
then it was MY turn. i thought it was probably some slippers i tried on when we went shopping for family together. they were so fuzzy and soft. even after i opened it i was thinking it was fuzzy slippers. i was smiling. and i said aww. but then i saw Nikon on the box. i was in total shock! and then i started to cry. it was a brand new D3100 Nikon camera with a brand new camera case to carry it in. how sweet. it was awesome!
I'm leaving out of town for a week and will not have access to a computer. So I thought I would leave you with some images of my favorite place in the whole world... Provence!
But all in your mind, tucked far away inside.
I called out and waited another minute.
We opted out of Christmas long before going on the road, but this new lifestyle certainly discourages the accumulation of stuff. If you got rid of almost everything and took your family on the road, what would change in your approach to the holidays? Would those changes be for the better?
The early childcare component becomes a fifth pillar for Mrs. Obama's campaign, which has four key pillars: Making school environments healthier; increasing the amount of physical activity kids get at school and at home; improving access to healthy, affordable foods by eliminating all US food deserts by 2017; and offering parents better information so they can make healthy decisions for their families.
MNAH = Might Need A Hospital
Dickens – that rag and bone man – didn’t invent the prunish woman. The old maid was a figure of fun long before he steamed into print. And if we unflinchingly follow the history of the prune, it turns out that it was once associated with the oldest of “maids.” Behind the prune-wielding disciplined ranks of the governess, the nurse and the headmistress, lounges the most venerable professional woman of them all: the whore. We still sometimes call a brothel a “stew” and it is because of the innocuous stewed prune. A 1612 collection of satirical poems called The Knave of Hearts features a whoring knave who takes “Burnt wine, stew’d prunes, a punk to solace him.” And in a similar collection published a year earlier, The Knave of Spades, a wanton entices a young man into her house of vice:
Stay away from tourist traps – As in any popular destination, everything from food to souvenirs cost more the closer you are to the main attractions. By setting a firm resolution not to be tempted by the obvious bait, you’ll find your spending money will stretch much further.
It is so amazing to me how much Mercedes has grown into her own little person from the itty bitty baby that depended on me for everything. Now, she still does depend on me for quite a bit, but its different. She has her own thoughts now, and opinions on things, her own preferences. She prefers water to juice. Sometimes she wants to be naked, other times naked is the worst thing in the world. She is her own cognitive being. She can form connections between things. Daddy got her a little ball the other day, and they play with together, throwing it back and forth. Earlier today she was sitting on my lap upset, drinking her sippy. Daddy walked in and she jumped out of my lap, ran and got her ball and threw it to Daddy, because she connected playing ball with him. She is on the verge of forming "sentences". She will say "watta.......pleease." Not quite strung together yet, but almost there.
Today, that's what I will choose to think about. I will keep my fingers from keying bed bug searches into google, I will sing silly songs while vacuuming behind the bed and take better care of my cast-iron pan. I will play puzzles with Theo. And all the while I will choose to think of Jesus, letting his reality and that of his kingdom sink into my head and heart.
1) Communication -- pretty much nonexistent.
Given the title and cover, this seemed like a cute summer read so even though it is not officially summer yet, I wanted to give this a shot. I was able to read through it in only a few sittings one day due to the brevity.
But, like English Literature, it is a subject you can return to as an adult and rediscover (unlike Chemistry - I'm afraid I blew my chances there). At least I had a good start from my first - and really only - History teacher. Thank you Mrs Grisbrooke.
My car, my first car, grey and small–and why have I never taken so much time before to look at the details of the ceiling? And then the earring clatters and bounces and my body, as if pulling its tired self from bed in the morning begins to shift again, this time moving forward. And in a slam of a second time snaps back.
Heading out to the Pumpkin Patch this weekend, so hopefully all those new photos will inspire me to get crafty!! :)
Well, sheesh you all. I started this post Monday night and here I am Thursday night, hopefully finishing this up. We have had a bit of a crazy week and I've been rawther (can you tell I've been reading Eloise with Em?) tired every night. Eisley has been teething and had a cold which equals no sleep for she and I, but lots of snuggles. Okay, no more excuses. On to the post.
Hi Rez- an 18 year old from Florida has got pop and indie sampling production, a nice flow and an undeniable love for rap and has a new album coming out on the 14 May. However he has already recorded three mixtapes and each has been an improvement on the last, with his beat selection in particular making him stand out as he seems to have an ear for current sounding beats much like early Chiddy Bang work.
The summer I was sixteen, the Travelling Vampire Show came to town. I heard about it first from my two best friends, Rusty and Slim. Rusty’s real name was Russell, which he pretty much hated. Slim’s real name was Frances. She had to put up with it from her parents and teachers, but not from other kids. She’d tell them, ‘Frances is a talking mule’. Asked what she wanted to be called, her answer pretty much depended on what book she happened to be be reading.
April 26, 2012 – 3:44PM
"And now, it's time!"
Finally, Ella lifts the pot and pours some milk into each glass. She and April sit across from each other at the table.
14Symeon has given an account of how God was first pleased to take from among the Gentiles a people for himself.
This research was supported by the Medical Research Council and MS charities, Roan Charitable Trust and Aims2Cure.
In my previous post on the MySpace decision, I had criticised the judgement for failing to throw any light on the knowledge standard that would disqualify the intermediary from claiming immunity under S.79 of the IT Act. I fully understand the court's reasoning in holding that MySpace had 'actual knowledge' of infringing titles that were brought to the attention of the company. But there was no guidance on what constitutes actual knowledge as opposed to general knowledge.
20Rejoice over her, thou heaven, and ye holy apostles and prophets; for God hath avenged you on her.
It seemed clear to Felicity that this would eventually lead to him offering her one of the capsules, and her years of anti-drug education had created pretty stable brain networks working against that eventuality. At the very least, she thought to herself, I’m impressed. If this is all a build up to spike my drink, he’s putting a lot of work into it.
Since the point sequence to a stroke may be simulated in an animation, it’s now very easy to draw animated dashed or solid, arrowed lines. Here is a screen shot from one of the demos.
Before its function ceased, the O’Finioan clone laughed and muttered, “You just wait…one hundred of my fellow Dunclones will attack the Olympics and show people what is what.”
They deserve to be admired – not only for how they taste, but also for how the producers triumph over the difficulties of growing grapes in this extraordinary place. That the wines themselves seem to be excellent modern dry whites that would partner so many of the foods we eat today is a bonus. It is remarkable that so many white grapes from around the Mediterranean world have had to wait for modern technology to come along to change the age old perception that these countries cannot make white wines. This is chiefly because they oxidise very easily and so in the not too distant past before cold fermentation and clean wineries the Bosco grape would have produced much less interesting wine than it does today. Looking back at old wine books from 20 odd years ago no one seemed very impressed by the Cinque Terre, so I can see that this is yet another region that has improved enormously with the application of modern technology as well as the passion and hard work of the new generation of winemakers.
Artist Development – The root is still creativity & music, it’s not all about the music business – LW Music Consulting YouTube Video –
It is easy to judge, it is not so easy to live.
At my little guy’s preschool graduation last year, his teacher asked each of the kids what they would like to be when they grow up. One by one the kids stepped up and announced their ambitions.
Cutsew: Baby
What is my past experience with journaling? Well, I have roughly 8 full journals that I diligently wrote in during the worst times in my life, beginning in high school, around age 16 years. That’s over 30 years of journaling. I saved all of them thinking my life could be neatly organized into a book with a clear path from birth to old age. (HA! Not so, when you are suffering from major depression and thoughts and feelings go up and down like a horse on a merry-go-round). I still envision that I may one day take on the challenge of reading my old journals and understanding them as if I was not the fucked-up kid with the mental illness. How can I ever objectively examine my life without being dragged into the underlining emotions that the written words will convey, that I suffered through? I may never be able to.
Ah, a question where I don't have to be waffle-y. While I enjoy reading short stories every once in awhile, I prefer full length novels. I enjoy losing myself in the world that a novel creates, and I like the fact that it takes me awhile to get through a novel.
#89- Steps To The Altar
6. Midnight Cafe (6:12)
And a tight fastened lip
I love it when inspiration smacks me upside the head!!
I took lots of captures, but for now I will only post a few:)
The sauce was thick and sweet and sour and very tasty with the crunchy tempeh and browned veggies. It tasted very sophisticated with the polenta, but I must say that I gobbled it all down in about 20 seconds. Oh well. :)
2 -1/4 cups fresh basil leaves (preferably young, small leaves of the Genoese quality)
Grill another 6 to 8 min. or until chicken is cooked through (165ºF)
Week 2: Spontaneous anniversary trip to Maine with The Pilot!
The point is, stress will either tear you down, or lift you up by making you realize what you’re made of.
When I get feelin’ better when I’m feelin’ no pain
Who are the AJDS?
Shoppe
What’s next for them ?
Fr. Jason Dy of Sacred Heart Parish channeled his passion for art and role as pastor in a project that uses recycled bottles as personalized memorabilia. He introduced this interactive art project to parishioners in 2009. He distributed empty recycled bottles inviting people to create a “bottled memory.”
If you exhaust those two, people will be driven to the wall – and then the safety valves won’t work. Then the urban poor will run out of the resources for miracles.
I stood in the chilly remnants of waves at 6am on May 19, at Port Renfrew. I filled my glass jar with water—water that may have flowed thousands of kilometres, water that may have been churned from the deepest depths of ocean, water that may have sunk the Titanic in a different ocean, water that may have flowed into the ocean washing away the blood of a fallen soldier or a victim of genocide, water that has given life to creatures and been recycled back into the ocean, water that carved out the mountains and valleys I have to bike through. 8382 kilometres later, I’m looking out from Cape Spear, Newfoundland, into the thick fog hiding the ocean and wondering what the water’s story is.
Wet Ingredients
* More admissions should be considered for the category of students who have already registered for a BSc course, thereby giving the high-achieving matriculants of 2010 and 2011 a better chance of gaining entrance.
The Gambrels of the Sky –
Not in mid June the golden-cuirassed bee
That makes hearts flutter, soothes all pain.
However, I am a fair man, and I went into this with the basic expectation of that this is a show that will, at the very least, deliver the same energy that K-ON! delivered, cute girls doing cute things. I’m surprised to say I got a little more than I banged out for, and that alone makes it worth the watch. The show is by no means the SOTY (sorry frustra) but I can see why a number of twitterbros were into it during it’s run last summer. I can also see where this is going to tip the balance of power in this year’s Saimoe Tournament, in the same way Saki tipped 2009/2010. I expecially liked the “documentary feel” to the first episode, and I honestly kind of thought that it would be interesting if they kept that throughout the show, but it would have probably crimped it somewhat.
Ne pyeoneuro modu da deungeul dollyeodo
Focus: Praying for the will of God to be done on earth and in heaven
IDW's Popeye #1, edited by Ted Adams, Craig Yoe and Clizia Gussoni, is illustrated by Bruce Ozella, a Boston graphic designer and illustrator who has produced advertising concepts, brochures, cartoons, flyers, magazine and newspaper ads, pamphlets, posters, programs and PR materials during the past three decades. For Popeye #1, Ozella did all penciling, inking and hand-lettering.
Alternatively, you could just separate the two sentences with a full stop between together and we.
When grown for fibre, flax is harvested after the pale blue flowers have fallen, but before the seed ripens, and because it is the stalk that is being harvested it is not cut, but pulled up by the roots. ... The beets (sheaves) are carried as soon as possible to be steeped (drowned or dubbed) in the flax dam or 'lint hole' where soft peaty water has been standing for some days to warm up ... The process of retting (rotting) takes from seven to twelve days and is soon advertised by a foul and penetrating odour as the core or 'bone' of the stalk decays.[9]
I grab a hold of the mic and let the words glide
don't feel so low low low life will get much easier
These accessories are used for macrophotography, usually they are used by novice amateur photographers that have a limited budget, a macro lens is usually pretty expensive, therefore is right to explore this genre trying to spend as few as we can with remarkable results beforse deciding if it is going to be the genre we want to perform or not... READ MORE
South African Revenue Service
~2~
“At the risk of patronising them, many weren’t born or were too young to appreciate just how dire the beer scene was in the early 1970’s. The likes of Watney’s Red, Worthington E and Double Diamond were spreading like some dreadful bacillus across the country. Breweries were either closing or switching to keg production.”
framework components / reusable solutions on WCS (B2B/B2C Process) at an organization
*even bigger grin*
I Believe...
I know, you’re probably thinking, “he’s a grown man! He shouldn’t be thinking about getting presents!”
In a previous blog entry, I incorrectly gave the grade equivalents for student work. I accidentally used the grade equivalents from my previous honors classes. Since all my classes this year are AP, these are the new percentages for AP work. The letters have the following meanings:
The robbers fled on foot with a laptop, clothes and alcohol after they couldn't get a car going.
Memorable Line: “You’re about to learn who you gonna call … Ghostbusters.”
So, we have a winner for Magnolia Christmas Advent Calender day 2!! :)
I've been reading Marc Lesser's book Less: Accomplishing More by Doing Less. I haven't finished it yet and can't offer a complete review. But one thing has resonated so strongly with me that I want to share it right away. He says:
1. Burgess, Stanley and Gary B. McGee. Dictionary of Pentecostal and Charismatic Movements Zondervan, 1995, pg. 789
He also follows Bumpy's example, and doesn't live a flashy gangster life, not wanting to put a target on his back, as he tells Huey. This is of course difficult, as it can conflict with "being somebody." A part of Frank wants to brag and show off his status. He gives in to this only one time, wearing the chinchilla coat his wife bought him, and buying seats for the Ali - Frazier match that are themselves a statement about his status. It's this one departure from his routine that puts him on everyone's radar, both Trupo, and Richie Roberts taking notice. Lucas gets his mistake, as Trupo is happy to help point it out. He burns the coat symbolically, but it's already too late, the word is out.
It would take the average chef exactly 204 years to save up enough cash to buy Ramsay’s LA mansion - and that’s assuming he never went out, lived on bread and water, and slept in a cardboard box.
I've also been trying to design a new layout for my blog. Webdesign is not my ish to begin with, but it appears that I'm completely without "design mojo". None of these layouts seem particularly better than the one I already have.
The present system has limitations and I’m sure that members of the council are interested to hear criticisms of those limitations.
CHURCH leaders will come under renewed pressure when a BBC documentary is screened tonight outlining the widespread cover-up of clerical sex abuse here.
so so excited and let me tell you if you can get your hands on this amazing magazine you won't be disappointed it's so ARTSY and full of awesome talented "chicks" and there's so much to be inspired by.
This list is not complete, but it’s a good start. And yes, many of us have help from dads, family members, and friends. But for most of us, most of the time, moms are the alpha and the omega of anything that might affect our children.
Fruits have many benefits for your health and well being, and if eaten regularly can even aid you in losing weight. Mentioned here are some benefits of eating fruits:
31And Phinehas, the son of Eleazar the priest, said to the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the children of Manasseh, Now we are certain that the Lord is among us, because you have not done this wrong against the Lord: and you have kept us from falling into the hands of the Lord.
An hour was perfect. I’m slowly going to get my body back to a stronger, happier place.
requires the phone to be capable of using both types of power control, it is
This recipe is jam-packed with some excellent veggie dosage: artichokes, sugar snap peas, and carrots. Aren't the colors just beautiful? The taste was so fresh and light. The sauce wasn't overbearing, and allowed the veggies to speak for the dish. I couldn't find prosciutto at my local supermarket, so I settled for some premium ham steaks (for a great price, too). I loved the ham, but I think next time I'll make the extra trip to the "fancy-rich-people-food" place to pick up some prosciutto. I think it would have added some delicious saltiness to the overall flavor of the dish.
The engineer/producers: Jack Endino, Brian Pake, Mike Sebring, Reed Griffin
With all the headlines, leaks, and general chatter ahead of the launch of Samsung’s next flagship device(s), what can we say with certainty about Samsung’s new flagship phone(s)? We’ve done the scut work of looking through them all for you, so why don’t you join us for a whirlwind tour of all things Galaxy S III.
Me: Hello Emerson! Would you like to sit up on the bed with me?
My mind’s eye widened in realization, my body immediately eased — it exhaled in full understanding, even though my brain struggled to comprehend.
This is always our "go to" place for all things related to the kid's schooling and activities. However, to ensure the bin doesn't overflow with all the papers I can't part with, I had created this binder system to house all my favs.
An official PJ source told Renascença that the news do not have any basis and are utterly false. According to “Diario Sur”, the new lead arrived at the Spanish authorities ten days ago and reports that a girl with physical similarities to Maddie had been seen in the city of Nerja, close to Malaga.
*Work on memorizing scripture.
Thanks again to everyone, your continued support is very much appreciated, and with such gorgeous creations this week you are all winners!
Every time I would google “Granger Supply”, “Apartment Finder in Your City” would pop up. Backspace and start over and “Cheapest Airfares” would cover the screen. Each time the search would redirect to another site. A minor stumbling block each time would follow with the proper searched site. No big deal.
When bourgeois ideas first begin to take root, they do so as the manifestation, not of the rise of the industrial bourgeoisie, but of the merchant classes, whose symbiotic relation with the Feudal Aristocracy establishes the system of Mercantilism, and with it Colonialism. As, the Black American Marxist, Oliver Cromwell Cox, describes, in “Race, Caste and Class” Racism arises as a means by which this bourgeois ideology, which asserts a fundamental equality – Liberte, Fraternite, Egalite – reconciles its actions in treating millions of human beings in the Colonies as fundamentally UNEQUAL! It does so, by denying their humanity. Although, logically, from the perspective of cold cash calculation, this kind of discrimination makes no sense for developed industrial Capitalism, as with many other aspects of society it inherits from the past – for example, in Britain the failure to carry through consistently the Bourgeois Democratic Revolution, the persistence of heredity in the shape of the Monarchy, House of Lords etc – the Big Capitalists prefer to deal with it by bureaucratic methods, rather than by a frontal assault on those sections of society – such as the small capitalists, reactionary petit-bourgeois etc. - where these ideas have strongest grip. Indeed, where they can oportunistically use it for their own advantage, to divide a powerful and challenging working-class, they are prepared to do so – though it plays less of a role in this respect than many of the Left suggest.
We live in a time when emotional abuse is not something that men are able to identify with because they are often ridiculed for acknowledging that they have emotions. When men are emotional, women and men often call them soft, weak, gay or homosexual and feminine. These references to the association of weakness and emotional needs of men are often just as abusive and traumatizing as when the man was first violated.
the evening couldn’t have been better, we laughed so hard at times, i thought we were going to get kicked out for being so noisy! i got lots of wonderful presents- let’s say that i will be very clean and awesome smelling for the next 6 months at least, i got so many amazing bath and body products! i also got the hunger games trilogy, a beautiful moleskine and pen, a spa voucher (thank you brother!) and other very useful stuff.
Shortcakes:
In retrospect it seems to me that the problem is that, while the brothers do come into collision with the outside world, they are essentially unchanged by those collisions: their fate is determined right from the moment when Langley begins the hoarding, and nothing that happens to them changes that trajectory (or lack of it) - which to some extent is determined, as Ann hinted, by the real-life story. They fulfil the static conditions of Langley's Theory of Replacement. Although I have been known in the past to rail against the tyranny of the conventional 'narrative arc', I find the lack of one detrimental here: while the twentieth-century follows its narrative arc (although Langley would deny that it does), the brothers themselves are simply static points at its centre, or rather edge, with no narrative arc of their own beyond a slow disintegration, and in spite of the wit and the lightness of the prose, there is a hermetic, stifled feel to the novel and ultimately a lack of tension (though I'm sure that Jo would disagree).
Relief Society was founded in 1842 as part of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-Day-Saints. (Which you have probably read all about on the NieNie Dialogues. : )
Kenny maneuvered a Slinky back and forth between his hands. He was lost in thought. The ringing of the desk phone jolted him. The Slinky fell to the tiled floor. “Buchannan.”
*Will’s 9 month post complete with battle scar photos (Will meet the coffee table, coffee table meet Will)
Here we have what seems to be a second cut up repeated New Year’s Court dress, this time from Mary’s first appearance in 2006. And this time…well, my jumpy claps are gone. The train’s been lopped off (why? Oh, poor train. I mourn the death of the train.), and a waistband’s been added. It really needed the updo, the train, and all the jewels to keep it from being a plain ol’ straight jacket.
Greetings to the masses of the world-wide web. This being my first entry, I shall not concentrate on any particular topic but merely paint a little picture of what goes on in my mind. It is by no means supposed to be taken too seriously and as time goes by I will get better with how I construct my blog entries.
Dove Save $1/1 Men+Care Antiperspirant 2.7oz or Deodorant 3oz (4/22) ETS
All's right with the world
This months ‘Race Engine Technology’ magazine has some interesting stuff for F1 Tech followers. There’s an interview with Mario Ilien, who explains the work he did with Mercedes-Ilmor including; Hydraulic KERS, a rotary valved V10 (+20k RPM & 78Kg) and of course Berylium for Pistons & Liners.
So I put on my jacket and then I put on me dogs Mod jacket and then me and Moon went downstairs and headed out for the short walk across the English countryside.
Another favorite was Bistro LQ - which offered up two exquisite dishes - the tenderest, addictively-flavored Braised Ox Cheek on Grits, and Wild Hare Terrine with pickled huckleberries (I think they ran out of stuffed duck neck which was to accompany the dish, at that point?) Again my inner glutton overtook the blogger - suffice it to say I would have eaten these all day if I could!
So last weekend was loooong.
DirectX®:9.0c
The Good That Won't Come Out - Rilo Kiley
August 25, 2011 – August 26, 2011
There were 2300 registered companies that belonged to black businessmen, about 1000 private taxi companies. 3% of the 50,000 vehicle owners in 1978 were Mercedes Benz owners. Soweto alone had more cars, taxis, schools, churches and sport facilities than most independent countries in Africa. The Blacks of South Africa had more private vehicles than the entire white population of the USSR at the time.
I can't tell if she's playing me,
When I first got the news, all I could think about was my precious Lily. My prognosis was grim and I had only 15 months to live without treatment. After looking at my husband and child, I knew that I had to do whatever it took to save my life. My husband and I immediately flew out to Boston, and I underwent extrapleural pneumenectomy surgery. The surgery required that I have my left lung removed. I was to go through chemotherapy and radiation treatment afterwards. All of this was very overwhelming.
The second win for the year, a good days gaming.
The front door opened, and they both turned toward the sound; the patter of young footsteps hurrying indoors, eager to greet their mother.
The two countries then signed two memorandums of understanding on agricultural and rural development cooperation and provision of technical fund by Vietnam for agricultural development.
8:03 PM – Here comes the pain…or not. Instead we get Johnny. Yuck. Johnny comes into the arena to a chorus of boos, and tells Teddy Long that Lesnar is not yet in the building. He then eludes to this being John Cena’s last night on RAW and demands that Teddy ask John to leave the ring. Teddy hesitantly follows orders, and Johnny moves on to introducing the show.
I received a Cricut for Christmas and my first use of it was to put the word Masterpieces on the wall in vinyl. Craft #1 a success so onto #2
About the time they gave the caroler from hell a sandwich and cup coffee to sober him up and sent him on his way, my pain went away. I was laying there wondering if I should just get dressed, rip out my IV and go home when a doctor arrived to tell me my labs came back wonky.
but I can't find another second in my days right now.
Their hearts like their houses are close,
I was raised in the deep South and I am very well acquainted with what went on there from the middle fifties, into the sixties, and beyond. I was old enough to start questioning why some things were the way they were. I got the standard answers that parents gave their children to explain why whites and blacks were separated in some areas and together in others. I'm sure that black children asked the same questions. I would imagine there were also answers given to them by their parents. I was surprised to learn in later life that my mother also asked the same innocent childlike questions when she was a young girl during the thirties. Life in the deep South during my youth was not totally segregated and people of all races formed bonds of friendship despite the tacit social barriers. Just as my mother sought to do something as a teen, and was told to let it go, so were many of us who later had the same thoughts and ideas. The problems were complex and so would be the solutions. Change is never easy and it always meets with resistance.
Little known to most, there is a decent sized problem of gluten intolerance that is widespread. Not only is there just a gluten intolerance but an autoimmune disorder called celiac disease. To break it down, people with celiacs have reactions to gluten protein found in wheat and other proteins found in barley, rye, etc. These reactions cause a variety of problems in the digestive system that are no fun at all. Many people go years and years without knowing about their issue which can lead to a very down trodden life. If you would like to learn more here are a few links, I am no doctor nor do I have the disorder so I don't want to go on like I know much.
- 50g feta cheese
Transvision Vamp
Chimney cakes! A street food that like a baguette meets pretzel meets churro big enough to wear on my forearm. Made wrapped around a steel cylinder over and open brassier and then rolled in cinnamon sugar or vanilla sugar.
Photography is also used as a metaphor for memory itself.
4. How many calories do you eat a day?
So - kill, shoot, kill, pew pew blam blam.
Now, whenever there is a discussion about Robert E. Howard being racist, three main arguments are presented. The first argument is that Howard could not be a racist because he never participated in any racial violence. The second is that Howard was a product of his times and racism was as natural as breathing back then. And the third is that Howard’s fiction is no more racist than other fiction of that period. To these cliché arguments, I roll my eyes and answer:
So we have a “blog” project that just has a simple Post domain class that describes a single post. When the class was written it had a title, body, and dateCreated, but it seems like a good idea to keep track of who wrote each post as well. To have a simple solution for the purposes of this example, we will just add an author String to the class (as opposed to linking to a users table as would likely be the case in a real-world solution). To keep things simple, we will allow this field to be null for anonymous postings. With the new field added the class looks like this:
Start your kids young and make it fun!
To be feeling so bad.
Money off toys
of a freckled shoulder, ribs and hips
So I am enrolling myself for this study and perhaps sit for an exam too later….I can’t say about that. But I think giving some of my time to learning something fascinating is worthwhile.
After my sun was finished I decided to sponge some clouds and I did a little bit of old olive sponging towards the bottom of my card. I did this sponging because I didn't want my card to be all white. I left my sentiment area white and so I didn't sponge over it.
Regular readers here know that I don’t post very much off topic stuff here, but every once in a while an opportunity arises that has to be shared. This is such a case.
Opposition leaders have long railed against the BN government for this unusual population explosion, alleging that illegal immigrants have been allowed into the east Malaysian state, and given MyKads and voting rights to help the ruling coalition retain control.
When your credit is in disrepair, it is quite easy to throw your hands up and think that things will never improve. Following the helpful advice discussed in this article, however, can give you a feeling of empowerment as you learn to effectively tackle credit issues.
He’s married
it’s only that I can’t come up on-cue
Unfortunately, the inmates second favorite weapon after the prison made shank is a lock in a sock. That is something that will get you all sorts of unwanted attention. And maybe 3-8 more years in prison.
Dinner was a grilled chicken breast with steamed veg, and I’ve just eaten another Nakd bar – cashew cookie this time, yum!
Style: Imperial Oktoberfest Lager
In short cousin marriages is an issue, however the laws of the Europe still do not prohibit incestuous relationship (a byproduct of ultra-liberalism which does not takes into account scientific evaluation), though it is been said that having children is a cause since grown up adults can have any form of sexual relation. There are certain states in Unites States too where incest has been legalize but the offspring of such a union is without doubt not considered healthy by the genetics scientists.
Dahlings, long time, no blog! Disgraceful!
Vashti: It was difficult at first, but it kept getting easier as I learned how to prioritize.
But in addition to all of this I got to see another jobsite today. Again it was a nice long walk reaching this other site, considering that it was on Greenwhich st (which happens to be past the first jobsite on Spring but in the other direction -_-”). Somehow I managed to do all this back and forth and beat the rain before it came down today.
But I don’t know if that’s true.
You have been a most naughty boy, and she is going to DISCIPLINE you pleasurably because of that.
And every bite i gave you left a mark
I feel healthy, with all the walking, aqua fitness, and yoga that I’m doing. Also, my high fibre cereal and green smoothies make me feel like I’m accomplishing something first thing in the morning, which I also really like. (as a constant checklist maker, it’s wonderful to feel like I can check something off before I even start my day!) I’ve been considering getting back into the weight lifting now that I feel so good, but I’m afraid that with my decrepit hands I might drop the weights on myself, so I haven’t taken that plunge yet.
- Eat them all or try not to !!
Basically the old doctor told us about the same thing, but they actually were able to give us an idea of how WELL she can see and also took the time to talk to us about all of our questions. The old doctor kept saying her eyes are fine and the wonky eye had some issues but the other one was probably ok. Real scientific.
Why should they go out to fight
“Yeah… That would be the one” Jonan confirms.
Thanks for reading! Don't forget to Comment, Like, and Pin!
Or maybe I won’t.
(Any negative comments will not be responded to and will be promptly deleted.)
This is such a pretty color and seriously flattering on everyone. I'm obsessed.
First person also has the same limitation that we as people have: it’s impossible to know what others are thinking. Just as first person allows us to get to know the main character on an intimate level, it throws up a barrier in front of every other character. Unlike in a third person scenario where another characters motivations could be explained in a quick sentence or two, now we’re stuck trying to work out why everyone else does what they’re doing. Your main character doesn’t have telepathy, just as in real life.
FIRST Robotics team, most work done early January - end of April 2012
he restores my soul.
○ “AIG disclosed its retention-payment program more than a year ago, and the amount of the bonuses — more than $400 million for Financial Products alone — had been widely reported. But as the payments were coming due in recent days, the White House began to express its indignation.”
Dove Save $1/1 Hair Care product ets (4/22)
Grind the chocolate chips in a food processor until fine and add those to the cookies and pecans. Stir until well combined.
In the last year before I retired, I had to wear a microphone clipped on my sweater, so that my voice could be transmitted directly into a headset worn by one student. He had with an auditory problem. He had trouble distinguishing important sounds (like the teacher's voice) from background noise. By that time, in my estimation, the whole educational system had gone completely round the bend.
2008-09 Fleer Hot Prospects
Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi: Don’t you have anything else to deal with except Egypt’s national security?
I don’t exactly know what lies ahead, but I’m excited for the adventures.
130. “To accomplish great things, we must not only act, but also dream; not only plan, but also believe.” – Anatole France
Cut off, leaving a long end for attachment. Lightly stuff. Sew to one edge of top of body. Follow picture for placement.
Level 30: Weapon ATT: +30, Accuracy: +10%, Proc Rate: 60%, Deals 250% damage 2 times.
The question is whether attempting to charge Apple what Motorola feels is “fair” rates, but which don’t look fair at all to Apple, and having Apple continue the negotiations over the long term seeking fair rates, is grounds to ask Germany (not chosen by chance, but because they have very restrictive views on such things) to stop allowing the import of Apple mobile products that use this 3G technology.
We had her fixed.
1. Build a powerful community.
The banks should be supporting the economy not the economy supporting the banks.
I know I will be making another just for him really soon!!! LOLOLOL
Realize that having emotional attachments to things is not what God intended. Once you lose your focus, the pursuit of things often becomes the “why” behind what you do. Even those things that have sentimental value sometimes keep us holding on to the past. Consider the real reason you have old greeting cards, clothes that you no longer can wear, or that special something that you absolutely refuse to let go of. Challenge yourself to put your stuff in its proper place. Clutter can keep you from achieving God’s righteous purpose. Whether your clutter is physical, mental or spiritual God has called us to live a life of simplicity. Clutter can hold you back from reaching your goals. Old relationships, memories and things can keep you from being productive. God wants your life to be free from bondage, of any kind. Find ways to embrace something new; it begins when you let go of the past.
Don't bother about John Connor. Dick Cheney already killed him in 2004.
After the hike, some of us went on to Gale's Pond for a while, and then I had a meeting tonight. I'm too tired to do this post justice, because we saw a number of rare plants. I'm going to beg off for now, and hopefully bring you some of those in the future.
Knew of him.
Which political cult of personality, nepotistic and term limitless probably as well (Pakatan is full of unvotable nepotism and term limitless mentality types) placed these idiot writers of guidelines that the majority of the voters did not accept in 1993 when BN was in power? Why have these BN era guidelines not been AMENDED yet and imposed on the Rakyat instead? By extension what makes the current Pakatan installed (instead of voted at 66.6% quorum) Council any different from the 1993 BN council ESPECIALLY if the same guidelines look set to be enforced without majority agreement (that even being subject to the minority of one rule that democratically ensures right to dissent???
The third night, same scenario and then after they are supposed to be in their own rooms, I hear Punky and Natty talking. Story time was over. There was to be no talking. I call up to them for them both to come down. Punky comes down with a huge smile on her face. "Natty brushed'ed my hair for me. It's so beautiful now!" as she twirls to make her hair fly out.
-The "NO YOU CAN'T" posters all over Megamind's Metro City.
In a bulletin posted on the church door during the fast, they said, “We hope that this fast will help to bring healing and reconciliation to the lives of all who have been affected by the scandal of child abuse in any way. We pray that recognising hurt and anger will lead to reconciliation within the Church, and that reconciliation will bring new hope to all of us, as we strive to move forward as true disciples of Jesus Christ.”
Firstly you missed the orchestra a taste of some of 2012′s greatest video game tracks. Every nominated game for the “Best original music” award was represented. The CVAs opened up its musical extravaganza with a song from Assassins Creed Revelations. They proceeded to send our ears to Tim Horto… I mean heaven with songs from Deus Ex:Human Revolution, Might and Magic: Clash of Heroes, Super Brothers: Sword and Sorcery and wrapping up the nominees we heard from Warhammer 40,000 Space Marine. But the CVA crew wasn’t done they wrapped up the shows live music with a stunning and eargasmic rendition of our favorite game melodies.
A neighbor would come stand outside her door and say “Are you all right? Why are you walking all alone?” And I would have to say, “Because.” And she would say, “Because? Is that an answer? Why?” And so I’d have to tell, full of shame, “No one wants to walk with me. They beat me up. If I go by the alley, they will get me, someone said”–I’d certainly not blab a name–”today.” And surely the neighbor would tell my mother, and my mother–or my father, or both–would lecture me, “You need to make friends, like other little girls. If you would go to school more regularly, you would have friends. Why don’t you make friends, you’re smart, there isn’t any reason you can’t make friends, like other little girls.”
Which is not to say that statically yearning unreconstructed romantics aren't occasionally fun. But when their Truly Tragical Romanticness is driven home with a hammer by the director (here, Mark Romanek), we get bored and a little insulted. We get it! We can't help compare Romanek unfavorably to our recent worshipee, John Sayles: in John Sayles's Limbo, there is a stock "nightmare torment angst" scene when tragic fisherman Jumpin' Joe comes awake with a gasp, causing lounge singer Donna to awake and ask what's wrong. A shaken Joe comments only that you can't always save people. END SCENE. DONE. We got it! Great! In Never Let Me Go, there is a stock "sensitive boy has tragical rage angst" scene, which is long, and detailed, and milked for all its juicy tragicalness. We get it! We get it already!
1 retained
Meberg takes the time in each chapter addresses a topic of something we have all craved happiness, romance, contentment, time, purpose, and meaning, each day there is something we feel we are missing in our lives. This book is an amazing reminder that we will always be craving more until we find a relationship with Our Savior and go to Him to find what we are looking for. Meberg tells us how even though we may not realize it we are craving more of God, we are craving Heaven, we crave Eden, we want God more just sometimes we miss the mark and believe there is something else that will bring us contentment.
...YOU. For following the blog and Twitter and bringing smiles to my face for your awesome comments and wit.
BUT… Pottermore Beta testing has begun.
“I thought you said I only had to do one math lesson today.” and “Oh so this is where I Finally use fractions.”
This is one of my couture designs. Would love to make that one.
Martin Edmond / from Luca Antara / 21-26
I'm so excited! I'll take pictures of everything tomorrow to share with everyone!
I Curse the River of Time - An amazing novel about a son's struggle to deal with the feelings of frustration and helplessness as his mother announces she has terminal cancer.
We met again at the lake
2nd Guild Project - "We have Dragons"
TLDR Don’t Watch This: pseudo-wincest… wait, shouldn’t that be for “watch”?
Fortunately, her inspiration and dedication resulted in the now iconic I am Woman. She recorded an initial version of the song for her first album but wasn’t satisfied with it. When producer Mike Frankovich asked to use the song I am Woman in his film Stand Up and Be Counted, Reddy took the opportunity to add another verse, tighten up the lyrics, and re-record the song. She gave Frankovich the license to use the song in exchange for him donating money to Women’s Centers in LA, New York, and Chicago. The new version was a major hit, going to #1 in December 1972 (her first of three chart-toppers). When the United Nations declared that 1975 was “The Year of the Woman” they chose I am Woman as its theme.
Skinny wifesy has a toothpick dad and a pipe cleaner mom. Never mind that when they got together it probably made the sound of two twigs trying to make a fire, never mind that. The fire was made and skinny wifesy was born. Now when you go to family gatherings at her place, you also have to look at her skinny relatives. The skinny is generations deep. So, why is it that they’re having this “all you can eat” barbecue? To screw with you, why else. Ignore the skinny you’re being surrounded with and suffocated by. Take a swim in the pool. And when her dad says to you, “You don’t move like a big girl,” just say, “Thanks, you don’t move like a midget either.” He is after all 5’3”. When skinny wifesy visits with your parents, you’ll have to deal with the fact that she’s looking at your round mother through one squinty eye. You’ll know she’s thinking, “Is this Christmas future?” Ignore it, because your mother will turn around and lose 75 lbs on her own. She’ll surprise everyone – her doctors, you, skinny-wifesy, and I think – most of all, herself. You’ll always be proud of her for it.
And the other babies in our family have had their share of cute stories this week…
Kyle loved the Vincent Shadow books. I have posted a review at 5 Minutes for Books (and a giveaway!) that includes both my thoughts and his. Please check it out. I was honestly a little surprised that these two books grabbed him, but each time I asked him how much he likes it (and even ask him to rank it against other books he's loved), it gets high marks.
As Tris tries to cope with the guilt of what happened in Divergent, she is often on the brink of a destructive breakdown or self-sacrifice. She is on an emotional and grief-ridden roller coaster, which makes her far more human and understandable than someone like Peter. She is strength and vulnerability and flaws and selflessness. And I love her! However Tris's behaviour puts a huge strain on her relationship with Four which is tested to the limits as they cross between loving and trusting, to unsure and troubled. It adds so much more interest and realism than if everything had been hunky-dory.
(I wonder -did he need an author pass to get in ???)
Mare51089: hm...
Roth’s “Plan B” is a bad, bad idea. Good ideas? Ensuring more effective and sustainable deployments of existing military forces in LRA-affected areas, building the capacity of civilians to protect themselves and their communities, and integrating robust civilian protection strategies into all efforts to apprehend senior LRA commanders.
Short Answer: No (provided you stick to normal cooking temperatures)
It is a bitch, Boy. Damn right. It's a bitch!
The market opens in a few hours!
Interacting with other people is the best part of Twitter, so you want to know if people are talking to you or about you so you can reply back. You don’t want to ignore people, do you? At the top of the page is this bar:
In college, I became aware of a website called Daily Lit where they send you pieces of novels through email or RSS feed. This was the first book I tried. I failed. It became too confusing with all the names. But since Joe Wright is directing a new adaptation, I felt I had to finish reading the book.
service his culinary needs. )
Johann Wolfgang von Goethe: “A man should hear a little music, read a little poetry, and see a fine picture every day of his life, in order that worldly cares may not obliterate the sense of the beautiful which God has implanted in the human soul.”
Back door, huh? Good idea!
V has her little Christmas concert tomorrow night for her preschool and I'm excited for her. It will be so cute. I hope My Love can make it and doesn't get stuck at work...they are getting ready for their upcoming deployment (ugh).
For salmon:
Because the box and lid are the same size, I find the
Now you might wonder how different is this from Jay Z’s conspiracy-themed lyrical diarrheas that he keeps throwing at us, presumably hoping that we could see past his ghetto background. Thing is, Psycho Social was recorded with absolutely no hope for commercial success. There’s just these two guys, Vinnie Paz (then Ikon The Verbal Hologram) and 15 year old Jus Allah rapping over Stoupe The Enemy of Mankind’s beats in a basement somewhere in Philly.
How about a class named Smoking 101?
I have faith..
Do you love purple? I love purple. I've learned it's a very polarizing color. You either love it or you don't. I grew up in a purple bedroom. For the 'elementary years' anyway. I painted my room often and changed the 'color scheme' regularly. But for a good part of my younger years my bedroom was purple and red.
the best TV shows, the most overrated people,
I've posted about how the effects of bullying can linger long after the bullying ends. People who have been bullied don't forget the fear or the self-loathing that bullying can create. They don't forget trying to find alternate routes to school so the bullies won't find them, or having to fight and risk suspension from school and possibly worse punishment at home to prove to the bullies that they aren't a victim.
This is my experience!! If you have anything to add, please let me know! Ok, so there are AIOs, AI2s, hybrids, pockets, envelopes, boosters, prefolds, longies, shorties, snappies, covers, prints, plains, snaps, velcro, PUL, liners, sprayers, deoderizers, wetbags, and the list.goes.on. I decided that in order to get hubby on board with cloth diapering, we would have to go with the easiest possible route- AIO (all in one). This diaper is like a disposable, but it's cloth- usually made with a waterproof outer layer. It can come fitted according to your baby's weight, or adjustable to fit your baby through potty training. Then I checked out the AI2 (all in 2)- same outer as the AIO but with a detatchable liner (liners are what absorb the wetness and stuff). For this one, all you have to do is replace the liner when your baby needs changing. Easy peasy. Hybrid- AI2s that you can use with a cloth liner or a disposable liner. Yes! disposable (earth-friendly, flushable and compostable) liner. For me, these are great for outings. Alright. Do you remember that I won a bunch of diapers? The style/type that I won are called 'pocket' diapers. The liner fits into a pocket, between the outside layer and the inside layer, never touching baby's skin. I love, love, love these for nighttime. Haven't had any leaks, especially when the inside layer is accompanied with a booster. Is your head spinning yet? You have got to learn the language. It really is a whole new world. LOL. Moving on- I admit that I got scared when I looked at prefolds and longies/shorties. Even so, I made my own pair of longies from a felted sweater just in case. The longies are adorable but they never made it onto S4. Prefolds- luciously thick liners made of hemp, cotton, bamboo or silk. They come diaper shaped or square/rectangle and you use fasteners to keep them together, (my friends mainly use Snappis no chance of sticking yout baby with a pin!) with wool longies- pants or shorties- shorts. Oh- and there are these dryer sheet looking liners that you can put on the inside of the diaper to help with catching poo. For me, it's a crapshoot (heehee) depending on if S4 poosplodes or not.
In a special room in a special pot,
If you pull the advertisement off the shelf, you will see something that looks like the picture to the left. This part of the ad has a lot more information for you.
Unusually, Wilma is seen wearing a blue dress in this film rather than her usual white.
The constant demands and always-ringing phones are enough to drive any sane woman crazy. Add to all that the condescending Katherine Fleming Katt -- self-promoting pastor's wife of the town's largest church -- who loves to flaunt her superior position. In the midst of such chaos, will each woman find the one thing she longs for?
+The Season Turn
a holy of holies
Well, the vegetable garden has been started!
is "What are your plans for R & R today?" (rest and relaxation!)
Rake is the only way to earn money for poker rooms and the since like other casino games, casino players the poker players are wagering money against other players and not against the house. Rake can be considered as a small entry taken for organizing the poker games. Today poker online is regarded as a major success stories of internet. Since 2004 rakeback has gained much more popularity and it is the best way of rewarding the players for playing in some of the top poker rooms. rake back poker is the best site that provides the players with best rakeback deals. It is a site which offers top promotions and exclusive tournaments rake races and free rolls. Whether you choose a poker room, full-Tilt poker, ultimate or Betfair this site will give the best percentage of rake and sign up bonuses.
Written-By - A. Cyrille 2:47
I had a really weird dream on Friday night. In my dream, I went to my fermenter to take a look in at my first sour beer (still in carboy) and it was completely clear like water. Not so much like water, but more like that clear Crystal Pepsi. Also (in my dream) it had half a pumpkin and some other random vegetables floating in it that presumably soaked up all of the color. Anywho...I realized upon awaking that Saturday morning that I should probably do something with that beer.
Is anyone still out there? Yes, it's me, your long-lost Diva Stamper!
Twas the Night ... Disney XD ... 12 PM
It has been said that even a mule does not step in the same hole twice. But I am not a mule so I will again step into the hole of making a sculpture that captures the essence of flames. I have to be able to do better that this thing.
#28Put food coloring in your toilet tank. If it seeps into the toilet bowl without flushing, you have a leak. Fixing it can save up to 1,000 gallons a month.
The winner of 3 digi stamps by Crafts & Me drawn by random.org is number...
Writers : John Frizzell
I called this freebie Bearing Flowers, because it is a bear, with a bunch of flowers. Took me ages to think of it honestly... lol. In this freebie, which you can get by clicking on the image above, you will get a coloured version in both jpg and png formats, and a jpg digital stamp.
It’s not personal, Sonny. It’s strictly business. ~Michael Corleone
My boy, short-lived human mortals who desire immortality should befriend the lord of death, who suspends his activities when invited to devotional discussions.
On the surface Ben, a peaceful and charitable Buddhist and Chon, a former U.S. Navy SEAL and ex-mercenary, may not appear to have a lot in common. But underneath their rather different exteriors they’re best friends who share a long-time friendship, a business growing some of the best marijuana ever developed, and a one-of-a-kind love with the same extraordinary woman, Ophelia.
2. Mary’s conflict is between her desire for freedom and her duties towards the greater community, her village and society in general. This theme is central to the book and made me think about Billi, my own heroine, who makes the opposite choice to Mary and chooses to forgo individual freedom for the good of the group. Did you ever feel Mary was in the wrong, especially when she goes so strongly against everyone? She says ‘her life is not her own’ but is anyone’s?
While Spencer is having a bad time trying to lie to Mrs. Benson, let me redirect your eyes to this image:
Amazing. I have to say that my favorite was the waffle with the mushroom. Wait, I also loved the clam. The spritzer tasted fantastic. We continued to learn about the mushrooms and schmooze. Hank signed books (which Dr. Food told me to bring mine and I didn't and I should have) and chatted with all of us.
Long rant today...sorry.
The project I have today is a slight variation for my normally very "G" rated blog.....we get into a little bit of "PG" area, so reader beware!!!!
dresses at another store. She even had money
But Jesus also says, Luke 16:31,
As others have reported from time to time you just run out of energy.
7 White Lightning 3:50
In fact instability of weather of this season makes me anxious about that the petals might fall too soon.
“Mafia retaliation is excluded as a possibility,” Todorovski said on Wednesday, adding: “We have leads so I think we will solve the case.”
It's hard to get upset when I understand the want/need to get outside and stretch our legs. Plus, she's so darn cute. And I really like the way she says Letters.
‘The Washington Times also sees a “rich association with European Marxism,” quoting at length from Wikipedia to prove the point’.
Urban Fantasy is always a tough one to judge especially since many books that are considered Epic and High Fantasy occur in a city of some sort. For this I generally go for the more rigid definition of a work placed in present times in an Urban environment although I still eschew most Paranormal Fantasy. As my list shows my tastes for UF lean towards the more male or harder edged stuff, which Kill the Dead had in spades. Kraken is probably Mieville's weakest book to date what with the haphazard and fractured-ness of it all, but still shows what a genius he is and that yes, he can have a good time. Sedia's latest release The House of Discarded Dreams hasn't been getting many mentions, which is probably a product of its release schedule, but it certainly deserves more attention as she brings home the immigrant experience more than her other books have so far. The story dances in and out of mythology and Urban Legends in very unexpected and original ways. All in all it was a good year for Urban Fantasy with many books trying to break the mold and as with Butcher recasting what has worked so well up till now.
Right, onto the new challenge over at A Passion for Papertrey which is to create an invitation. Interpret this as you will - could be to invite a pal over to lunch or a children's party invitation. It's up to you.
Did you know So Delicious Coconut Cream is an amazing substitute for heavy cream in any and all recipes? It doesn’t taste much like coconut (at all), but provides the same creamy texture. As an added bonus, So Delicious Coconut Cream has no fat and only one carbohydrate per serving. In a 1/4 cup (as in, the amount of milk you’d put in your morning Cafe con Leche), there are ZERO points. That’s right, morning coffee is ZERO points. Double woo-hoo! Right, chicken tikka.
Treasure the patches of deepest shade, the terrain of ancient, towering trees.
Ho colorato l'immagine usando i Copic con colori accesi e allegri proprio come le carte della Basic Grey che riprendono il tema dell'amore.
For more District Indie stories, click the links below to read what my my fellow Carnis have to say this week:
Implications on policies?
Payment can be made through the paypal button on this blog.
Great. So am I.
The Islamic definition of Slander is the following: To say something, about someone, that is either known to be false, or that cannot be proven, exclusively to make a person look negative in public. This definition of Slander is directly derived from two chapters of the Qur’an, Surat-ul-Humazah (The Chapter of Slander) & Suratu-Yusuf (The Chapter of Joseph), which details the slander of Prophet Joseph (Peace be upon him), while he was in Egypt, in the household of an Ancient-Egyptian official, whose wife accused him of trying to rape her, and our mother `A’ishah (May Allah be pleased with her), when she was accused of adultery, by the leader of the Hypocrites in the city of Al-Madinah, during the lifetime of Muhammad (Peace be upon him). The Islamic definition of Hypocrites, by the way, are people who only pretend to be Muslims, for various alternative reasons; but, in reality, they do not truly believe that Islam is true guidance.(Noble Qur’an: Chpt.63, V.1-8) During the lifetime of Joseph (Peace be upon him), his life was literally in danger, he was on the verge of being executed, and all because of a lie, and so was our mother, `A’ishah (May Allah be pleased with her). Had Allah not allowed the truth of their affairs to be exposed, then, both of them would have perished unjustly, just because someone thought that it was amusing to slander a Prophet & slander the wife of a Prophet.
The recruiting strategy has caused some tension in RCMP ranks. Some long-serving Mounties privately say they don't feel that race and gender should be major parts of the hiring equation – they argue jobs should be given on merit only, and that being a police officer remains a physical job.
Since 2006, Jesus Romero hit her with their car, put oven cleaner in her face wash, installed a GPS monitor on her vehicle, placed a recording device on her phone, kicked and bit her, she wrote.
Wears the same number as Tim Lincecum #55.
Do you carry a back-up gun?
I felt the group worked fairly well, though we could have spent some time then on the timing of the animatic as the key thing we are working on for this module is timing in animation.
Complete Voyager
gospel of peace on my feet, the helmet of salvation, and faith as my shield. I
For the second approach, these particular circumstances result form the exploitation of the valuation of the imitated product, which is possible only if the imitated product enjoys a certain appreciation and high profile in the perception of the relevant public, which needs to associate at least some positive properties with the product, resulting in particular from its quality, exclusivity, luxury or prestige value with the product.
I can play that on the piano. I'm likely to make a few mistakes but it still feels good.
As we begin the new year (Writer Beware's fourteenth!), here's a look back at some of Writer Beware's most notable posts and warnings from 2011.
A home modeled on perfection, finished with exceptional quality, central to all that is important, and destined to impress. Prado. A reflection of you.
Berkley Prime Crime, Jun 5 2012, $25.95
Hold on to destiny
11 process
* Photographs will be accepted 3/14/2011 (today) - 3/31/2011. Once all photographs are received Little Diva Tutus will publish a folder with either a collage of your childs photographs or an individual photograph of your child to be judged by our anonymous on-line judges.
“Oh yes, Oscar actually turned into Mother Superior.”
Meaning is where you put it.
You are invited to the most fabulous Blog Party ever! We, the team members of Inspiration Avenue is having a party for three weeks non-stop and you are invited! We were so excited to have 500+ followers who every week participate in our creative challenges, that we decided to throw a party and to celebrate them : our friends and followers!!
On week three, we will purge our entire home and give away to those less fortunate. Our minimum goal is to give away 210 possessions, something tells me we’ll find much more. Anything in excess of the 210 items will be sold for debt reduction.
The goal of ipResearch is: to become a forum to share and exchange best practices, ideas and issues that arise within intellectual property management.
My cousin, a florist, shared with me how to plant the sprigs
Writing about the death of J.G. Ballard for the New York Times (21 April 09), Bruce Weber spoke to Ballard’s American editor at Norton, Robert Weil. Mr Weil said of Ballard: “His fabulistic style led people to review his work as science fiction. But that’s like calling Brave New World science fiction, or 1984.”
After I posted What I Do Instead Of Punishing My Kids, I had a few people ask on my Facebook page about potty training, and how it can be done without punishments or rewards. I think it starts with changing the way we approach it, even changing how we talk about it. If a parent looks at it as "training" a child then it will be almost impossible to do without the punishments or rewards.
I don't think it's happened yet, but already, some politicians are trying to put in motion a bill to dissolve the Knesset and hold elections in September. The ones in favor of this who particularly bother me, besides any leftist politicians favoring it, are the pretentious Shas party, apparently because they want the "Tal Law" written up so that Hasidics won't have to serve in the army.
The Hubster has been dying to the go to the “tunnels” while the kids want to go geocaching any chance we get. Since I had never accompanied the kids to the tunnels before and Hubby had never been geocaching, we decided to compromise and find a geocache near the tunnels.
50. Keeping the flame of friendship strong and bright because there's nothing like it in the world.
But not the sort you're probably expecting. As I look back over my blog in the last few months I really feel like I've kind of lost touch with what I was doing. It's gone from fun with others to just painting nails and that makes me sad :( I'm going to be stepping back to try to figure out where I went wrong.
Of course if they were real our history would have been re-written long ago , but rumours and people's beliefs cloud our judgement some times ( not all of us though ! )
I HATE THIS
I'm a sucker for 60s and 70s folk. Vashti entered my life through one Mike Gehenna, whose blog isn't really updated anymore but after he posted her Some Things Just Stick In Your Mind compilation I immediately became hooked and went right out and bought it. Her guitar skills are impressive in their own right, but what immediately shines is her crisp, melancholy voice. "Winter Is Blue" is one of many lost-love-focused tunes she penned when she was in her late teens. Winter is quite white here in snowy Baltimore, but this has been a fitting soundtrack to walking through two-plus feet of powder.
Stay tuned for some posts and some blog changes.
"Weekend with the Masters" presented by American
DW: Some of the criticism I have seen from people on the Internet is, “If this group is so vast and so powerful to fight this cabal, why is Benjamin Fulford the only one talking about this?”
That is why the latest reports from the Church in Holland are so painful and a matter of deep shame even to those outside Holland who have never had any contact with the Church in Holland.
the alarm was based on all the strange crimes… many are theft of weird / trivial items, and the increasingly poor behavior of our fellow citizens… “Rude and Belligerent is the New Normal” … and most pointedly memory of a conversation I had with a friend who has lived through good times and bad… fought in wars, “police actions” and fires.
Click here to watch a scene from Chopper:
The company started its first store in the CBD area of Sydney, Australia and was called Woolworths Stupendous Bargain Basement on December 1924. Cheap location in Brisbane was the reason why Woolworths decided to open another store there in 1927. Until that time having a chain of stores was not in the minds of its management and owners. The strength and relevance of Woolworth was proven because despite of the depression period Woolworths kept expanding, opening a store in nearby New Zealand in 1929. From then on the store chain kept growing.
It's nice!
Front 242 - Circling Overland
"Good, good, you're all dressed I see. Like to see that you've made an effort!"
Another example from the same division would be Tyler Colvin. It seems to me that he did enough last year to earn a starting job, but instead he will likely split time with the likes of Fukodome, Pena, and Soriano. If those three guys are healthy all year, the at bats they take away from Colvin make an otherwise intriguing player so much less appealing in the draft.
“We’ve had a great run! Six years of whirlwind funfilled adventures thanks to TLC and our many many supportive &diehard fans!,” she wrote, adding, “I poured my entire self in2 the last6years of ‘Kate Plus 8′ & I can’t wait2have the chance2challenge myself again w future endeavors!”
I appreciate any well meaning comments about how I should "Never take my eyes off the kids" (I know mom, you mentioned it before) or tirades about how my two year old isn't ready for potty training (potty TEACHING, excuse me) or anything like that. I am committed to my claim that she is in fact potty trained despite all evidence to the contrary. This was an example of venting. I don't want advice.
These last few days have been confusing. These last few days have been the first time I have been told to stop lighting the spark within one of my students, the first time an outside influence has told me to give up on a kid. I don’t understand how those who profess to love their kids can simply use them in games, be abusive towards them, or be indifferent about them. I don’t understand how the best interests of kids can be, at times, so easily ignored.
That meant I had to weigh my options... white is always the default, but I have a white (er, off-white) mirror sitting right next to it, plus a white frame that will soon be hanging above it. White was out.
Train your child the way to go; when he gets to the top he won’t be able to depart. When we talk about training the children, God said in Deuteronomy 11 v 18-19 He said what you talk to your children about when you are in the home with them; is what will determine how God will respond to them.
As someone often says "what is wrong with right now if you don't think about it".
happy birthday :: in lieu of singing "happy birthday" we opted for a rousing chorus of "the final countdown"
It’s a sojourn of sentry soul that’s unaware of changes,
Hi Everyone!! Here in Australia it is the end of the school year! My boys have now finished Grade 4 and Grade 1 and what a hectic few weeks it has been! I apologise for the lack of blogging, I've just been too exhausted to keep up with it all of late. I do however have a couple of journals to show! Each year I give covered notebooks to each of the teachers and aids (which this year came to a total of 6!) and although I'm not going to show them all, I thought I would show you a couple! ;) This one went to the Grade 1 teacher (who my eldest son also had a few years ago!) and I know she loves pinks and greens.
Posted on Sun, Apr. 02, 2006
But it's easier to stand and watch
I love the versatility of the little black knit dress. I've actually considered wearing this dress for a week to see how many looks I can eke out of it using only what's currently in my wardrobe to build around it. Maybe I'll start on Friday, and consider this a taste of what's in store. I played it safe, really... I initially was going to wear my vertically striped black & white knee high socks with my faux 1920s black pumps instead of with the leggings and boots, but I chickened out. It seemed way too dressy for school, and the leggings and boots toned it down considerably. I ended up wearing it with this sweater which looked pretty cute, though I totally forgot to snap a pic of it on my way out the door.
This behavior (rolling through stop signs) represents a choice, whether the police are present on that day is a chance occurrence. Texting while driving represents a choice, plowing into the back of a stopped truck while texting (an unfortunate, but likely outcome) is a chance occurrence – many texters justify their choice by the fact that they haven’t been in the wrong place at the wrong time – yet.
Second, the primary reason legacy publishing has traditionally been able to take 85% of an author's earnings is distribution. Because no author could cost-effectively distribute her books in paper without a distribution partner, legacy publishers have been in a position to charge an 85% monopoly rent for paper distribution. The other services they provide -- enumerated above -- are add-ons. How can we be confident about the relative value of distribution vs the add-ons? Because if those other services could be disaggregated from distribution, no author in his right mind would pay anywhere near 85% for them, and publishers would not have the negotiating leverage to charge such an amount.
Behr Natural Gray.
In a decision issued last week, the German Federal Supreme Court BGH had to decide on a patent relating to a method for transmitting e-mails using the SMS-Standard. The method required a modification of the data structure according to the SMS-Standard and the solution employed mechanisms which had already been provided (though for slightly different purposes) in the same standard.
Janus Publishing describe their Subsidy Publishing as:
****Abbreviation for "Dungeon Master," the game participant who leads the "players" through their adventures. The DM is sort of like a rules referee and story narrator all in one.
I wanted to give some heads up on events over the next month. I'll be a very busy boy, and I hope to meet many of you while out on the road. Please come and see me!
06. Goak-On-SOUL
Decent or not I'm here in California thinking of George and just wanting to rid my head of him. For the record, he's a great guy and it's not that I think he's the scum of the earth, just disappointed of actions took or not taken. Let it also be known that, yes, we had only been on 4 or so dates and no, I'm not crazy and saying I lost the love of my life. I'm just a slightly more deflated-balloon (think Winnie the Pooh when he goes honey hunting) because not only did I feel we had a possibility but also that it was ended so passively, presumably meant to only keep me guessing (Will he call today? Maybe that email is from him? Yes this sounds pathetic but you've all done it too!) until three weeks go by and I must guess that yes, he's either been eaten alive by one of those rabid raccoons running around central park or, I probably won't see him again. I also just can't stand , and I'm talking can't stand like you hate the the mean girls who tease your new bracelet in High School, the way that this inevitably makes me a drop more cautious, a drop less trusting and a spoonful more weary. I like my optimism verymuchthankyou and it's frustrated when someone comes along and messes with the whole layout.
“It was the first time I had ever heard the word ‘skint’ and what he said is totally true.
Okay, so I’m Catholic. A practicing Catholic. And I am therefore supposed to (required to) go to church every Sunday.
The expressions 'Web' and 'Internet' are used interchangeably by the layperson. This is technically incorrect, as the Web is contained by the Internet. In practice, however, most people don't bother with the distinction.
What are your respective backgrounds?
The concert hall at the Syndey Opera House holds 2,700 people. This blog was viewed about 40,000 times in 2011. If it were a concert at Sydney Opera House, it would take about 15 sold-out performances for that many people to see it.
this is an glassine envelope with a piece of printed paper in it ( for a liner ) and then the doily on the front is an tear drop edge circle diecut from a spellbinders die. the tag on the front was stamped with the PTI set on a shipping tag that had a green re-inforcer on the circle, tried coloring it with copic's which failed so ended up finding the krylon gold leafing pen would cover up the green. the butterfly die cut was done on a scrap of MM pp. the red string came tied to an etsy purchase. the cherry cobbler seam binding was rak'd to me from Leigh Anne, ( Thanks :) ) the ric rac is vintage. the button on the butterfly is a craft store one. so this is the "wrapper" for that wood butterfly going in June's Easter basket.
Marisa
Surely they noticed I had a different surname on the endless enrolment forms I completed? Surely they weren’t trying to ‘right a wrong’, giving me my husband’s name to save me from the public humiliation? Surely this wasn’t a simple mistake (ok, maybe it was, but bear with me while I inject a little drama in the lead-up to making my final point).
Guest:
This lady got a letter from the Department for Work and Pensions saying that following her medical test she was found fit for work and was told by a “back to work adviser” to attend some gym sessions.
You’d almost certainly go home, via a British airport, thinking you’d seen a slice of the real Britain. But, in one sense at least, you’d be totally wrong.
"But Charles Wallace doesn't look different from anybody else."
What exactly is it that Rosalind is studying? The usual … issues of history, global politics, religion, popular culture, sexuality, science, technology, military, and theories of the future. Very cool stuff! We are looking at the development of mind control technology for the British military (think distant viewing), then there are conspiracy theories, connections with occult organizations, Soviet brainwashing and more.
For 30 days, he would give money to anyone who asked of him. Whether that was his spare change, or millions of dollars of resources that his firm controls.
If I had ever slept until noon my old mom would have dragged my pyjama-clad ass down to the local veterinary, grabbed a hypodermic and put me to sleep permanently.
To open up the space between, a new wide arched opening was added in the demising brick wall, seamlessly integrated by proportionally mimicking style of the existing arches. A synonymous window was installed on the east wall to create maximum light exposure in the new “great room”. Care was taken to preserve the loft’s history as a warehouse, and later an artist’s studio by keeping and accentuating its inherent openness, large steel skylights, material textures and exposed structure. To accentuate the mass and presence of the exposed brick wall, the new stair was cantilevered off of this inherently structural element. The wall was extended up to the top of the stair bulkhead, clad with re-used brick recovered after demolishing part of the wall for the new arch. New skylight above stair now brings in more light, inviting to enjoy the new outdoor roof terrace and garden. The Kitchen and family Breakfast room were positioned in the most brightly lit part of the apartment with two large existing skylights, which flood the space with natural southeast light.
S'more Filling
“As this was the first year the award was given, the trustees wanted us to talk that out and think about what we were actually asking of radical publishing,” explains Power. “We talked about whether it was a problem if a book was essentially academic or whether we wanted something that had already garnered a wide appeal. But our major political dicussion was around whether we were looking for something that diagnoses the present or summarises the past - or something that points the way forward.”
Please click the above link, YouTube has a few videos…i am still looking for the film that i watched on tuesday eve that the protesters using a little toy car as a battering ram against the police with riot shields…i found it quite funny, the police’s response to the oncoming mob with the little pink car was to retreat but batoning the car as the retreated.
Among all the participating at the Challenge, someone will be drawn with the random system to win this fabulous Stamp from Stamapvie Sarah Kay "Adele Enjoying fresh appeles".
1476 D-X/14/2003. “From El Greco to Caillebotte, From the Old World to the New: A Columbus Day Celebration.” Jurisprudence Class, The School of Law, Loyola University, Chicago, Illinois
After a good 30 minutes though, I finally had everything as smooth as I could get it, and it was time to wrap it all up with batting.
Until 3rd January 2010
Amber stood there facing the hooded man, her shoulders relaxed and her head tilted to one side. He wavered in her vision as he raised the knife and licked the blade. It didn’t scare her. Her handbag slid down her right arm to the crook of her elbow as she raised her hand. She held it out to him, palm up, and blinked languidly.
In the hands of creative artists, the leading smartphone, the iPhone will continue to push the photographic boundaries, from the traditional to the abstract, while continuously exploring new ways to merge vision and technology with the artist’s end result.
The Catholic News Agency reports that Syria’s Christian community has suffered terrorist attacks in other cities, too. Last month, a car bomb exploded in the Christian quarter of Aleppo, close to the Franciscan-run Church of St Bonaventure. ‘The people we are helping are very afraid,’ said Bishop Antoine Audo of Aleppo, who is overseeing a Catholic aid programme. ‘The Christians don’t know what their future will hold.’
While I was growing up, I always imagined my life would include writing in some capacity. Whether it was for pleasure or as a side project to a fulfilling career, I continually visualized that creating characters and worlds would run in tandem to the life I was going to live. Somewhere along the line, that all got pushed to the wayside.
We move onto the house whites for our second (and ahem, third) round of drinks. At $7 per glass, it's a much more budget-friendly option, and the pinot grigio (made by friends in Griffith, we're told) is perfectly light and crisp.
Whilst I am not religious, I defend the right of anyone to choose their religion and practice it how they wish (as long as they are tolerant of others and don’t force it upon people). This piece suggests Galloway has done something bad, wicked, awful. He’s got religion… but the wrong one! Had he gone to St Margaret’s CofE Church in Frizinghall, would there have been this outcry? I doubt it. Religion is a matter of soul and faith, and it is a deeply personal matter which has nothing to do with one’s ability to serve in Parliament… which is just Galloway’s point. It does not matter one bit what religion, if any, he is. Do Muslims make better parliamentarians than Sikhs? Are Catholics good for local issues but, in Europe, you need a Protestant? Is a person who discusses their lack of religion a better law-maker than one who chooses not to discuss it? No, no, no.
Our lifestyles are completely different now! We now track everything we eat and keep our calories in check. We eat healthy fresh foods, lean proteins and and have cut a lot of unhealthy foods from our diet. It is shocking the way we used to eat! We work out 6-7 days per week and have both started running. We each have signed up for races in the coming months. We have dropped sizes and pounds and we feel great! We both still have a ways to go, but we have lost a combined total of 56lbs! We are doing this for our husbands, our children, but most of all, for ourselves. We want to be fit, toned and healthy to be able to enjoy the blessings that the Lord has given to us.
Q: How much do you make?
Richard Nixon’s paranoia brought on a cost review of the CIA. All the proprietaries were closed. Wilson moved on to the Office of Naval Intelligence, doing much the same work, as well as setting up spy ships disguised as fish trawlers. This time, the improprieties were noticed. His task force was shut down. Wilson had the possibility of going back to the Agency, but it would be without the import-export cash. He would have to give up his growing estate, his cattle, his thoroughbreds. It would be the cars and food of any other DC chump. Wilson left government behind, and went back into exotica supply.
Moths.
Sufjan Stevens--To Be Alone With You
Responsible Pet Owners Alliance
“What shall we do?” asked George. “Even if it is Giovanni, we can’t just accuse him without evidence.”
I needed to forgive myself for what I thought was the cause of why I am now going through certain circumstances.
I am not succeeding.
· Stretch Marks
The Z.E. offers a no-fuss interior – simple-looking but packs all the accessories that you will need in your daily commute. Controls are done via the panel situated just beside the handbrake, and although it packs a functional turn-knob with a couple of function buttons, it feels slightly less intuitive than those found on other continental offerings.
Wow, did it ever work! Not only did it get the grout very clean, it also raised an amazing amount of ground-in dirt off the tile itself. My ceramic tile has an earthy, mottled pattern to it (camouflage!), so I didn’t notice it was getting…earthier and more mottled over the years. Soon after I started working on that perfectly reasonable sink area, my OCD kicked in and I continued working on the entire floor of the kitchen and entryway from the garage – no small feat. I destroyed two entire sponges and a fair portion of my anterior deltoid before I decided I could go no further with it at the moment. I still have just a half of the entryway floor and another portion behind the kitchen table to finish. Fortunately, running out of supplies gave me a very good opportunity to illustrate with a photo what a difference the homemade solution is making:
Fruit. YUM. Honey. YUM. Lime. YUMMM.
then the flaps between the 8 1/2" and 10 1/2" score lines...fold in.
27 XMas Trees / Marital Aids
I visited friends down in Sussex and was taken on a tour of the Homes of the Stars in such unassuming corners as Shoreham By Sea: Chris Evans' beachside retreat towers over his relatively ordinary neighbours, and Mr and Mrs Fatboy-Slim' s house along the coast is even more discreet, backing onto a lorry park and practically in an industrial estate. That's the way to avoid the papparazzi. In Lewes, which has the most delightful town centre, there had been some mild looting the previous weekend, resulting in the disappearance of a large number of lavender pot-pourris and several bars of organic chocolate.
--Linore Rose Burkard, award winning author of
Every job is good if you do your best and work hard. A man who works hard stinks only to the ones that have nothing to do but smell. ♦ If enough people think of a thing and work hard enough at it, I guess it's pretty nearly bound to happen, wind and weather permitting. ♦ Remember me with smiles and laughter, for that is how I will remember you all. If you can only remember me with tears, then don't remember me at all.
** Eats **
I jumped as far as possible and felt not only my foot but my leg go in, my boot filled up, I put my other foot down for balance, and it also disappeared and filled, I tried to lift my leg, but that did not work, on the contrary, QUICKSAND!!!
Signature Room, 95th Floor, John Hancock Building, Chicago, Illinois
Note to self: buy more brushes and odorless paint thinner.
we sat by the fire. we stared, amazed at the sky covered in stars.
So, it's another new semester around here, and new semesters have begun to feel less like an exciting new adventure and more like an endless loop. (This is why I'm such a lousy blogger these days, by the way: it feels like I've said it all before.)
9. Rise to a sitting positition, remain sitting and recite the first part of the Tashahhud in Arabic: “Atta-hiyyatu lillahi was-salawatu wat-tayyibatu As-salamu ‘ala an-Nabiyy wa rahmat-ullahi wa barakatuhu As-salamu ‘alaina wa ‘alaa ‘Ibaadillah-is-salihin. Ash-hadu-al-la-ilaha illAllahu wa ash-hadu anna Muhammadan ‘abduhu wa Rasuluh”. Note that while reciting “Ash-hadu-al-la ilaha illaAllahu …” one should move the index finger of the right hand in a small circle like you’re drawing a circle on the sand beach with your index while the hand is still on the thigh. Only the index should be moving, the rest of the fingers and hand don’t have to move.
Lord, please help us to live with joy!
The question I've got is who says that the ultimate metric of life is how long it is? I still don't get that. I'd argue that each of us is trapped in this thing we call a body so getting it to a point where we're comfortable in it for the duration of our time here isn't necessarily a trivial or simply superficial thing.
The band also consists of drummer: Sandy (Stella Maeve), guitar player: Lita Ford (Scout Taylor-Compton), and bass player: Robin (Alia Shawkat). However, other than Sandy's determined effort to masturbate with a shower nozzle while on tour, these characters are basically extras–background folk, if you will.
Reaching us, Harrison wipes beads of sweat from his neck. He looks flummoxed. “How are you?” we ask, each extending a hand to shake. “I ain’t worth a damn,” he says. “I just tore up $1,500 worth of prop this morning.” While working on the boat the night before, he figures, he left a wrench in the propeller cage. The hefty three-blade Kevlar propeller looks like it’s been gnawed by pit bulls. We commiserate. He looks like we felt one morning a few years ago when we stood over the twisted hulk that had been our beloved Cessna, smashed by a summer tornado.
Mention Holland, and Heineken, hash cafes and hookers might be the first words that pop into your head.
170g caster sugar
‘And has raised up a horn of salvation for us
Each coming summer there is a new Queen.
On the one hand, I can appreciate how it would be a decent act to keep the real girlfriends of one's past out of the glare of the public eye. If you were writing an autobiography for the purpose of presenting yourself as a public figure, with the intent of trying to push yourself off in politics, it might be kind to leave real names out -- especially when you were talking about sensitive matters of the heart.
3. WHAT ON EARTH am I doing with my life?
All of which is to say, hopefully we’ll get a Nice Smile LP soon.
Parliament and a judicial inquiry are both showing the advantage of absolute privilege: the ability to allow things to be said which otherwise may not be said because of fear of what the media will do.
3) People who drive slowly
I enjoyed Monica Sone's book Nisei Daughter very much.
Camillia Lufti's husband converted to Islam so that he could divorce her. Despite their protests, the couple's 16-year-old twins Andrew and Mario Ramses automatically became Muslim when their father converted from Christianity to Islam, under a tenant of Egyptian law. Islam is the "dominant" religion in Egyptian law, so in a religiously-mixed family, the Muslim has the power.
I've got lots of presents to sort out and tidying to do so I'm going to take a few days off - probably until New Year's Day to give me a week just to chill. I may be back before but we'll see.
Well actually, the hungry people demanding food and shelter are not animals. They are human beings whose dignity has been stripped away from them in the aftermath of an awful tragedy. An earthquake is a natural disaster, but the humanitarian disaster that is now affecting Haiti so badly is of human design.
Looking into the earth just inches beneath the runways and dance floors of couture houses and after-hours clubs, one might find the obsidian blades, bone awls, and prayer remnants of those who knew why people lived here in the first place. There would also be items not from here, traded with those who knew why other places made good homes; those reasons lost too beneath cities or just lost. Some claimed to know the history of the place beneath their home, but most such stories were so diluted by time, politics and the murky minds of men as to be unreliable tales at best.
* To dive inside the Brazilian music. The guitar and the percussion are present and played everywhere in all the beaches and squares of the country.
I was surprised by his reaction to the milk, but I obliged his request and went back to get him a smaller glass. We only had two different glass sizes, so I chose one of the smaller ones and brought it back to the man's table, again feeling proud of my ability to provide quick, tailored service with a smile.
Canada should kick political correctness down the road and let this fellow remain in Canada and become a citizen. Indeed Canada should open its doors to many more whites from South Africa. We accept people from every corner of the world as refugees but apparently only if you are of the Politically Correct pigment, that being any shade other than white.
And so Communism does not have the answer; it cannot conquer the whole world and then bring peace and happiness as it claims it can. But in the meantime it is preparing for one very important thing which has to happen before the end of the world can come, and that is that there has to be one, unified world government from which Christianity has somehow been kicked out. And that Communism has been doing very successfully.
Mostly though, they're happy in their singlets. In fact, if you popped into the Fibro after school any day in summer, you'd probably find them in singlets and undies... and nothing else.
There are lots of things that will save the day though – in the end:
1/4 teaspoon almond extract
How continued it’ll yield you to achieve your way through DK Boscage Climber will depend on how actively you accompany the assorted collectibles that are broadcast aloft the game, which aswell abstracts into how harder the bold can be. You adeptness breeze through a affiliated in a minute or two afterwards so abundant as the blackmail of accident a life, and aggregate nothing. If you appetite to grab all assistant coins, the DK coin, and the panels that spell out KONG, though, it’ll yield a lot added analysis through abundant added chancy terrain.
I'm sorry - I have to sneak them in where I can.
Radio silence was in effect so the drivers of the two cargo trucks said nothing. Tanner was pretty sure he knew what they were thinking, nonetheless. He doubted if it was complimentary.
My husband and I went and watched him play and sing with my sister Julie and her husband Nick. It was such a fun night! Soon after my sister brought me over a couple CD's one was just piano music and another one was one of his first CD's he produced of his own music. Maybe his first. Not quite sure on the details. I played it in my quilt shop for years. Every once in a while a college student woud come in and recognize the music. I have watched him grow and find himself in his music and it has really been a cool thing to watch. My watching has been from the side lines. I'm not a family member, or a close friend, just someone who loves his love for music. I can't wait to see what's next!
There's still time to submit some pics for the next Respect the Outfits reader feature! Remember we're doing our "stylish" outtakes. Many thanks to you ladies who have already submitted your pics - and for those of you who are still interested, you can check out the details here!
In fact, I'll go on record as saying that this is the biggest letdown since the 1988 Baltimore Orioles, The Star Wars Holiday Special and Caffeine-Free Diet Mountain Dew.
Boots - Antonio Melani, Thrifted
We make a big deal about pregnancy and birth, but not nearly so much about gestation. The Maya tzolkin calendar is 260 days long, and approximates the length of human gestation, the time we are in the watery darkness of the womb, becoming. The moment of birth is the moment of emergence into the world, when we take our first breath.
We are pleased to inform you that Dr Felix Boobenstrausser’s degree certificate is entirely genuine. He holds a doctorate in Astrophysics from the University of Dortmund.
Quin - I don't know (the land before time was on and clearly not a good time to ask her questions)
I think the reason this look didn't really last is because it was extremely unflattering. But you could hide an imminent bundle of joy (or a few shoplifted rib-eye steaks) in one.
Lionel Messi broke the 39-year record for most goals in a single season in a major European league, scoring for the 68th time with a hat trick on Wednesday to eclipse former Bayern Munich striker Gerd Mueller.
- Kunik (New York, Goat)
The most remarkable thing about today is how QUIET she is. We went out for lunch, to the library, and to the grocery store. She is usually yelling, fussing, rocking, and trying to reach things. She sat so quietly every where we went. I just can't get over it. It was the first time we've been out to eat in about two years where I haven't felt like she was disturbing the tables around us. I just love watching her take it all in. I hope it doesn't wear off!!!
Premature ejaculate should be flicked over your left shoulder.
This one verse offers God the opportunity to "dig out" the deep roots of our thoughts, sets us on a pathway of healing from the past, and reminds us to look to Him for our future. And if you're like me--struggling with those pesky memories or wishes that never seem to give you peace--try praying this prayer yourself. God is faithful. He can lead and guide you in all areas--even your thought life.
I was happy when I left Zlý Časy that day, but I forgot one thing: To visit the beer shop on the premises. It is supposed to have a great beer selection.
According to Anders Jacobsen’s Blog, which republished them, these two maps originally appeared in the Faith Central section of the (London) Times, but they’re now gone. They’re a bit exaggerated but the point is clear—and true (click to enlarge, and check the link above if you want them as a single figure):
In any case, there was one poem I really love, which makes the whole collection worthwhile: 'Hemmingway's hat'. It's a sort of genderbending poem about new love. No, it's more than that - it's about how we are the sum of various parts, of our histories. It ends with joy.
Talking about how to handle bullies and how parents and educators can provide needed support is critically important. Parents and educators need to take action to identify bullying that may be happening now, to stop bullying that is taking place and to prevent it from happening in the future.
“I’m saying I can’t risk it.”
I turn back to the band -
To be fair to Zephaniah he may have been lucky that most of the media was too politically correct to ask him how he reconciled rejecting a nation which produced the great abolitionists, and who's navy pursued and attacked slave traders. whilst revering a nation where slaves were openly owned less than 80 years ago, given that the only credible answers were likely to expose a level of instinctive racism which the left like to pretend only exists in reverse.
An idea that makes you sit up and go WOW that’s something a bit different. A killer idea would make me dip straight into the script right there and then even if I have a million other things to do.
Here's one of my 3 Valentine loves
"But I introduce important elements in the beginning."
Stamps: A Year in Flowers 1 (Flourishes)
There are many other factors to consider as well when cold calling. When is the best time of day to call? How many hours should I be calling? Where do I get leads? What are some examples of scripts?
Be yours today and especially tonight.
Cuddles.
Included is everything needed to make your own copy, cd tray layout, cover insert and even a cd label scan to complete the package. Plus in true GT fashion, yet more photos and stories unseen and unheard to back up the flashback.
Udderly Smooth is a family owned and operated business here in the USA for over 30 years and was originally invented for dairy cows, under harsh conditions. Now its used world wide on people with dry and chapped skin, and can be used as a Diabetes Foot Care, as a Facial Moisturizer, General Moisturizing Lotion and many different other uses.
he never knew
* Suzuki Sashimi. This is hybrid striped bass, seasoned with red shiso and topped with a tangle of mango-infused preserved yuzu & peppers
My sister Margaret (Average Quilter) gave me the material for this quilt. She had it already cut out so all I had to do was piece it and quilt it.
This past weekend Daryl the trucker arrived home. And has been in "farmer mode" ever since.
The editorial continues:
We could start reading to people the quraanic verses about zina. And shaking fire and brimstone filled fists at them. We could go all holier than thou and speak of the ills of the age and how parents are failing at their duties. Or we could say: “What am I doing. Me, Saaleha, what am I doing to help?”
So then the rancher leaves for the fields.
Well, have fun. What is sad is that in this age of enlightenment and erudition and scientific progress there are people still clinging to such antiquated ideas as Darwinian Evolution. I guess we can only hope and pray for those tired souls who grasp at the illogical straw that is Darwinism. Here’s hoping…
Here is the second sci-fi poster. This time, it’s a quote from 2001: A Space Odyssey. The graphic image, of course, is HAL.
The San Francisco District Attorney has dropped a criminal investigation into allegations that the Anti-Defamation League of B'nai B'rith illegally obtained police and government records on a wide array of political groups.
_e163563597edeada.manifest.
I know exactly where I am, I'm in the middle of fucking nowhere and about to get stranded. Bollocks! Why didn't I renew my AA membership?
My first stop when I'm propping for a photo shoot is always my old shed... There are many things living in the shed - old cushions, fabrics, some furniture, interiors bits and bobs - and I'm sure a snake or two! Most things are tucked away in plastic bins - to protect them from the dust and dirt - and when I have a shoot on the way, I rifle through the bins with the hope of finding something that I'd forgotten about... Today, I found a bin that was tucked away behind all of the others - and boy oh boy, did I find a few old treasures in there... One of which, was this old table cloth... My aunt gave me this table cloth many moons ago now. I just love the colour of it - and you just don't find lace work quite like this, these days... I was so excited about the discovery that I just had to drape it over a chair so that I could catch a glimpse of it every time I walked by! Crazy non! Already I'm beginning to plan the Christmas table around it... Can't you see it?
Wow. Here we are almost an entire month into 2010 and I haven't written a THING. I had first put my lack of bloggage on the doctorate work, but considering I have taken a huge stall in that area, perhaps this is not accurate. Then I put it on how I wasn't running many new trails (for example, this is from Diablo, which I have run several times now-- and it wasn't even a new trail!) but then I realized I ran several cool trails over Christmas break in Santa Barbara and then I explored Mission Trails in San Diego over MLK Jr. weekend.
We work in the jail ministry, my hubby and I. One day P said, “Mom, wouldn’t that be really neat if you or Dad actually presented the Gospel to our birth family in jail?” I do think it would be really neat. What I think is even neater, that my 14 year old daughter had extreme treatment the 1st 4 years of her life, that she remembers most of it, and that she is spiritually and emotionally in a place that she has a burden for the people who hurt her.
I feel quite relieved while I read Right Ho, Jeeves. Mainly because I realize that there are many more such earthlings. On that note.
Of the commercial businesses, 13 have not signed relocation agreements with FCR, according to the ESDC. Five owner-occupied units remain; some of those owners have agreed to leave, while Daniel Goldstein, spokesman for Develop Don't Destroy Brooklyn has publicly vowed to fight eviction.
Typical. Always the same rehearsed corporate pleasantries no matter who the driver is. Mattie imagined each Greyhound employee memorizing a script like a Disney ride operator spewing the same old publicly sensitive ear full of corporate garbage designed for the least offensive administration of the rules possible but she couldn’t care less what anyone had to say because for the first time since arriving at her son’s home Mattie felt relaxed. All that was left was to suffer one more (possibly the last mind you) bus trip then back in the safety and quiet of her home. Sometimes though, remembered home was the place where no one would be waiting for her. Bus rides and memories, for Matilda, there was a need for developing a proficient mastery over remembering too much and the strength to push memories way back in to the dark part of the brain where the worst things are collected and stored out of sight. The biggest problem with not remembering is once anyone does their damnedest not to remember something that is exactly what they will eventually do and generally the memories come back like a bully. Greta’s ghosts were poking at Mattie’s guilt as she settled in to her middle row
I am attempting to do a better job about why we pray a certain way, do certain things at Mass, etc. For instance, our daughter is pretty good at learning the prayers - and that is the first step, but I realized recently that she may not really understand some of the words or ideas.
I had a hard time facing 40, and it was because I had set 40 as a goal for myself. When I'm 40, I'll have this.. When I'm 40, I won't be doing this.. When I'm 40, I'll look like that.. It was hard to face because I hadn't delivered on the goals and felt like it was a deadline I missed.
The ARC seminar mentioned that all special education (and self contained classrooms) does for our kids is put them in "a very special room with very special people." And that only ends them (when they are over 22) in a "very special place with very special people" and as she said "those places aren't so nice." But today I think I like the idea of a very special place, where Kendall doesn't feel so different. And I don't feel so sad.
We taught English in Xi’an, China for the fall semester of 1990. As a result of the student protests and the tragedy of the massacre in Tiananmen Square in 1989, foreigners were few and far between in Xi’an in 1990. In our very large university, there were a total of three English teachers. There were no other families.
Here is the Card Patterns sketch:
Dominic Elsworth
5. Allow it to dry completely.
When faced with a menu item that I can see as a challenge, I go for it. Fried pig ears seemed like enough of a challenge for me while we were at Euclid. They are served on a wooden rack with plenty of hot sauce and ranch. The ears are cut thin and fried to a perfect golden brown. They paired wonderfully with Avery’s Reverend.
My week in Tucson culminated with a nice day with Peg Cox up in Phoenix on Thursday morning...For those of you who know her, she's doing great...looks even better than when I stopped to visit her last year! She's looking like a fashion plate in this photo, isn't she?
In the music industry market of today, musicians and bands need to figure the best ways when it comes down to how to market music in the most effective, productive and visible ways. One of the ideas for musicians, especially those that are singer songwriters that I bring up as a music consultant is to try the concept of a single subway tour.
On the way back, several passengers sat in the shuttle bus for more than a half hour waiting for a driver. We got the last seats, and after us people had to stand (with all of their bulky purchases). One of the passengers left the bus to tell the driver (chatting on the sidewalk) that the bus was full, let's go. (He said he had to wait 10 more minutes but we took off after 5.)
DRESS: New Look (around 2009 I think)
Beyond brainwashing the media has a more sinister role in spreading terror and encouraging obedience they do this by ensuring that any transgressors, and any who dare question the new orthodoxy are punished severely, humiliatingly and in public. When the modern media exposes alleged “ra##ists” like Tiger Woods ex-caddy, or, they hope, John Terry, they are performing the same function as the stocks in medieval town squares, or the show trials behind the old Iron Curtain, their purpose being to scare the public into acquiescence.
Title: First Date
5) Shopping in normal stores often bores me. I like the thrill of the hunt that I get at places like Marhsalls, Nordstrom Rack, etc.
The Ruby Slipper was recommended by two random people before we set foot in NOLA. Walkable from the French Quarter at 200 Magazine Street, we hit the spot for breakfast. The menu combinations were impressive, and husband declares he experienced the best French toast of his life.
It turns out I’m too scared of my training plan to skip it.
-Blood diseases: Check!
L also offered to divulge all of Belinda's secrets . . . but Gina didn't want to know. She preferred to keep the image of her favorite Go-Go safely where it should be: in the past.
Conservative leader David (call me Dave) Cameron has recently announced that the Tories will introduce a cap on immigration, which would reduce the number allowed in each year to “Tens of thousands”. Tens of thousands of immigrants would of course be an improvement on the current situation, (if Cameron really meant it – which he doesn't) but only in so far that, instead of allowing in numbers equivalent to the population of Newcastle each year (I say Newcastle based on “official figures” - the population of Bristol is closer to reality) we would still be “welcoming” a new Carlisle, Wigan or Grimsby year after year after year, not to forget the anchor babies they would immediately start breeding after they arrive.
Oh well, I shrugged it off and found another copy right next to it, picked it up...
Idly, I looked up how to renounce UK citizenship. No bullet-proof booth (shades of the confessional), interviews with embassy officials, long-term left-over tax liabilities, huge fees, or other general big brother nastiness. You just do it online. And if you want to take up being a UK citizen again you can do that online as well - once certainly and, at the Home Secretary's discretion, repeatedly.
The Hum Aapke Hai Kaun actress can’t stop raving about how Ashutosh played a perfect husband by sitting at home all this while. She adds, “He played a very good husband and a father while I was busy with shooting. He didn’t take up any assignments. He also gave me various inputs with regards to the screenplay and direction of the film.”
I departed from the house at noon to briefly visit Theodore’s church. Upon my arrival, I refused to step out of the car. His church has always made me feel slightly uncomfortable, though I have never discovered exactly why. Emily had been waiting in her car as well, and I eventually resorted to calling Theo.
Ants invading the kitchen.
For her tenth birthday party, we all watched Poltergeist. That clown. Oh my god that clown. Clowns still freak me out. Poor Mrs. CBF. She had a roomful of traumatized children. If my mother’s reaction was any indication, Mrs. CBF got an earful for allowing CBF to screen such fare at a birthday party.
In short, I think I should drive in on days that include a pool session… All valuable lessons and will be fun to look back on some day. Imagine I may not be alone in all the gaffes I seem to be making on a routine basis so if you have any suggestions or want to share similar mishaps in the hopes of saving me the trouble I’d be glad to hear ‘em….
Neither. Both are rubbish. Although “it was a dark and stormy night” makes me think of the running Peanuts gag about Snoopy and his novel, and so is preferable for that.
2. new pillows in living room
Krishna married 16,108 women. However the huge majority of these (16,100) were married to him all at once after he rescued them from their kidnapping into a harem. This leaves eight primary wives.
Barry Manilow – Barry Pincus
There’s a lot of swagger in Tampa. Men are bulkier than in Denver, where we all bike, run, hike, something. Women seem thinner, more inclined to wearing as little as possible (and I couldn’t blame them if they went full-on nudist in this climate). My former impressions of this place led me to think of it as monolithic: polluted, traditional, and unhealthy. I’m seeing that there’s more to it than that. There’s a strata of progressive culture and diversity mixed in. I’ve been to Whole Foods and found a yoga studio. The food, which I’d thought of as solidly corporate chain, has proven to have a mix of diversity. Today I’m trying a divey little Greek place and last night I sampled an off the map Thai place next to a head shop.
Both Jesus and the Holy Spirit have taken a subordinate position to the Father in the plan of salvation. God the Father is the God of Jesus and the Holy Spirit. This is clearly seen in the New Testament where the word “God” (99% of the time) refers not to a three-in-one God, but to the Father. The few exceptions are where the term “God” refers to Jesus or the Holy Spirit.
I had always pictured myself having biological kids first, then becoming a foster parent. Turns out that was God's plan too, and we were blessed with two beautiful girls. But the goal to become foster parents never waned. We were just waiting for the right timing. We were *this close* to becoming foster parents to a student in Ernie's class in Oak Harbor. However, a more suitable family was found (one that lived in Oak Harbor, a definite plus) and so the idea went to the back burner again. We were still preparing though. I kept all of our gender-neutral baby clothes, along with some toys and baby gear. The infant car seat is in our garage, along with the crib. We are prepared to welcome a baby into our home.
Well I didn't tell her that she was waisting her time.
Said Moon...swallowing his pride!
Please do not dwell on the fact that my designer paper is upside down, because by that point, I had an hour and three layers of splodge and die and resin and other goodies invested in this blessed tag and was not about to go back to the drawing board! Oh no, I think it adds a certain "aloofness" don't you think? A certain "je ne sais quoi". Ooooh where is my beret and jaunty scarf?
When I was a kid my family used to go on holiday to Cornwall, the land of clotted cream, tin mines and windsurfing. I don’t recall any of those but I do recall three things – ‘windswept’ cottages, the old Hillman Hunter that used to get us there, and Cornish Pasties.
It’s still very early days and we would very much welcome your thoughts on our plans. Feel free to post comments below or get in touch with me directly at clarke.francisg@gmail.com
Tyler Filiaggi/Jack Jerge (6-0) (6-0)
In another travesty, politically correct toadies allowed the ritual slaughter of an American eagle as a tribute to ethnic diversity, thus granting hunting rights to new aristocrats while declaring such rights off limits to the rest of US commoners without the proper bloodlines and religious rituals. One is reminded of the hunting rights for royalty declared, for instance, by Henry VII's first Parliament in 1485, which made unauthorized hunting in prívate forests a felony punishable by death, fine or imprisonment.
But the facts speak for themselves. Take a look at the table compiled by supporters of the struggle based on information from the Police Station. As against Bidari’s claim of cases against only 40 to 50 people, just one FIR filed on 21.11.11 accuses “Udayakumar and 3000 others” of sedition and waging war against the state. The accused in this case are not people who want to secede from India. Indeed, just a few months earlier, they were part of the 74 percent of the electorate who turned up to cast their votes. Their alleged crime, in this case, was to have questioned the safety of the nuclear plant and delayed its commissioning.
Bronwen has a habit that makes me (and you other mothers out there) cringe. It is not completely uncommon among preschoolers, but she really seems to revel in how much it revolts me. I have attempted to convince her to stop with protestations of how dirty and yucky it is, but to no avail. Yesterday, we had another conversation about it, and I tried a different approach (which you will find, FAILED)! If you were a fly on the wall, here is what you would have heard transpire:
Cody was at soccer camp Thursday and said that when he went to sprint he felt something pop in his hip. He has a fracture in his hip and the bone has pulled away from his muscle. So he will need to stay on crutches for 2 weeks and then put some weight on it after that. He has a doctor appt in 3 weeks to see if he needs physical therapy or worse case.....surgery.
The company is trying to highlight the perils of driving in heels using this fun video which you can check out below. Its shows a (fairly) elegant women strutting her stuff a long the high street getting admiring glances from passersby. When she gets to her car though that’s when her troubles begin.
17. Being There: Jerzy Kosinski
True to Cartoon: FE 9, RID 7
I didn't listen and instead used every platform to get the truth across. That we were vindicated of any wrongdoing, coupled with the High Court's finding that former Premier Rasool had violated the Constitution in setting up the illegal Commission, justified my breaking this rule.
Wishing everyone a wonderful weekend ahead!
Now I can’t stay too serious on one thing or I’ll stay bummed. Here’s a picture of Marion Butts:
I am grateful for my life. Grateful to be an artist. Grateful to view the world through artist eyes.
Kelly Panacci - 360 Degrees -3 ring circus, Hoopsy Daisy and Chipboard Medley
My boss said "Can't it be welded?"
We could have thrown up our hands,filed for bankruptcy like most people in our situation would have,and walked away from everything to start over somewhere.
In 91 criminal cases in Texas since 2004, the courts decided that prosecutors committed misconduct, ranging from hiding evidence to making improper arguments to the jury, according to Innocence Project data. Yet none of those prosecutors has ever been disciplined, reports the Texas Tribune. “It paints a bleak picture about what’s going on with accountability and prosecutors,” said Cookie Ridolfi, founder of the Northern California Innocence Project, who researched misconduct data in Texas and other states.
I'm reading....Still reading Grace for the Good Girl and books about yoga.
Hang on to that cup of coffee today- wheeeeeeeeee, I have something new and a lot to show ;-P
The reason we noticed this film's uncomfortable white-washing/colorblind racism/callitwhatyouwill, is because, when business really gets going, the Busters hire an additional member of the team: Jesus-loving, down-to-Earth guy, Winston (Ernie Hudson). And then we spend the rest of the move watching him get ignored - sometimes even, literally pushed aside! There were shots where the original three would have their conferences about what to do about Gozer the Gozerian, and Winston would just kinda be off to the side - we think Bill Murray was probably even blocking his line of sight! Then little, insidious things, like when the Busters have to cross their beams, and they each get a close-up shot of their face as they fire up - except, of course, for Winston, who is just shown in the end as being in the crossed beam group. So much for individuating him - out of a group of four, he becomes the only member who is truly amorphous, without distinction. It's really lame.
Back in the good old days of America, people would have shot those cops and burned the banks (if good old Americans hadn’t been such racist imperialists…).
A veritable cavalcade of “Beer Champions” will be presented to the assembled guests, in the form of a quick introduction and chat with your very own Prof Pilsner before they are dispersed to tables around the room to share their time and talents with each group. At the ringing of a ceremonial bell, the Beer Champions will arise and move one table along to continue the festivities until all tables have been visited or the champions have no voice left.
Fraction, Matt and Stuart Immomen. Fear Itself. 2011. Marvel Comics.
will not let you
In the same way, no part of the bacterial flagellum can be taken away and the propeller still work.
But the first warning signs arrived in a spectacularly tight 1999/00 La Liga campaign. Barca would finish five points behind Javier Irureta’s famed Deportivo side (who still managed 11 league losses and a low points haul of 69) and it would signal the end to Louis Van Gaal’s tenure as coach.
Everyone wants a job today – but they are not coming back – for when no REAL skills are required, you can be replaced by a machine, a computer or a person who is happy to earn 1/4 of your pay. The job demands deskilling – that is why the job needs managers. This period is ending. This is why.
Wow. 100 days of photos and blogging. It feels...weird. But in a good way! I never thought in a millions years I'd make it this far. I'm very much looking forward to another 100 days and beyond.
She can be reached at C.Luedecke@lrz.uni-muenchen.de
Funny thing that happened at the vets though... She was on that metal table you put your pet on, surrounded by Mom, Sis, and I. Dad had gotten out of work early just for her and just showed up inside the room. Faith got so excited she peed a little on the table, tail wagging her whining in excitement. She moved a little forward to dad, tail still wagging, and... her tail hit the little pee puddle, splashing it at my mom and sister. I somehow came out of the unscathed, but dad and I were just laughing at how she did that.
There have been complaints about the cost (over R60 million or $8,5 million), there always will be. It could of course have been spent on any number of other worthy causes. The reality is that it wouldn’t have been. Other very worthy mission-oriented fundraising efforts by the MCSA have not succeeded, but this has. Almost all of the money has come in. Why? Is it an idea whose time has come? Is it a tangible project where the results can be seen and measured? Or was its very conception inspired and blessed by God? The latter seems certain, the others probably also.
To order, please choose your postal region and click the PayPal button to the right.
I may be older and a lot slower than back in the day, and my goals and motivations for running and racing have changed. But one thing I've come to realize is the day I stop getting hyped for a race is the day I die.
The latter would meet context with its nearest neighbor along the south side of the street, but, of course, vastly out of context with the expected 34-story modular tower Forest City Ratner aims to build and the arena nearing completion.
When asked his feelings about all of his latest accomplishments, notably "Africa for Africa" being distinguished for its extraordinary artistic merits, an extremely humble Kuti replied, "I am very happy, thank you, but I have to work harder."
This module covers a minimum of ten (10) hours of courses, required by the Occupational Health and Safety Act (OSHA), which apply toward 10-hour General Industry course completion card. This course is comprised of 10 training modules, covering topics pertaining to regulations covered by Standard 29 CFR 1910. The successful completion of this course will help you to identify common hazards and the proper methods to reduce the risk to yourself.
What other crazy eye-contact gimmicks have you heard? Why don’t those “tips” actually work when delivering a public speech?
Although we are very pleased with how they turned out (considering how scary-difficult building drawers sounds), we'd probably make the drawer fronts wider so it would hide the support boards and rails. We decided in the beginning to just make them a perfect box because we knew it'd be easier but if the drawers were visible all the time, I wouldn't really be happy with this look.
The biggest names performing there today include Jay Sean, Jazzy B and Mumzy Stranger. As you can see, even Boris Johnson. Mayor of London, enjoys honing his skills at the Mela (believe me, 'change the light bulb while patting the dog' does work sometimes...well, if you're an aunty-ji)
We started AZT and Isentress, within days of one another, in early March.
Deputy Chairman, NATO Military Committee (‘90-‘92)
Cook on low for 4 hours. Serve with a green salad.
Let’s get things started by announcing the Top Mouse awards from the December 17th sketch challenge.
Here were fond climates and sweet singers suddenly
With bmi Regional, bmibaby transferred to International Airlines Group ownership on completion of the purchase from Lufthansa. IAG has consistently said that bmibaby and bmi Regional are not part of its long-term plans.
Here are 2 tapes of Aissawa music I picked up in Meknes ca. '99. Unlike the released CDs of Aissawa music available in da West (featuring groups from Meknes, Marrakech, and Fes), these tapes make no pretense of presenting a balanced overview of the Aissawa ritual. That is, they don't include any of the lovely sung poetry in honor of the Hadi ben Aissa that would typically open a ritual performance. They cut straight to the chase, hitting the ground running with with blaring ghaita oboes and pounding tbel drums!
Have a good day, everyone!
make a way out for me 'When you finish college, Son,'
This is not one of those ripoff direct-response piece of crap ads you see all the time where you read, scroll down the page, read some more, read a few testimonials and then get hit with the "To discover how to do this yourself and make gazillions of dollars working just mere nano-seconds a day, send $99.95 to this address and blah blah blah."
PCBs and Dioxins also do not pose a significant threat. PCBs were outlawed in 1977 and Dioxin emissions have been reduced by 90% since 1987. There was a study on salmon intake that showed increased deaths due to PCBs and Dioxins, yet it was based on 7 servings of wild salmon or 3 servings of farmed salmon per week, for seventy years. Plus, the added amount of deaths was 24 for wild salmon and 8 for farmed salmon. It failed to consider though the amount of cardio deaths that would be prevented due to the Omega-3s in the salmon. In fact, 7125 deaths would be prevented, making the added deaths very insignificant, the benefits far outweighing any risks. Plus, there are more PCBs and Dioxins in beef, chicken, pork, dairy and vegetables than in seafood. Once again, the FDA supports these conclusions.
Maybe this will be the Call Of Duty to shape them all, but only time will tell. Check back for more news later today.
You're surrounded by lies right now aren't you? Deceit, misplaced desire and fat lies?
Looking forward to: Seeing BABY at our ultrasound tomorrow!
It was….. Fragmentary
He stopped me and we talked. He was mostly very complimentary of Edward and my riding. "I must say that it is very... refreshing to see someone take their riding so seriously and with diligence." He felt that we were just a few steps away from being unbeatable. We had very, very good eventing dressage, but if we went up against "real" dressage, it might not go as well.
Another good book in the Luxe series. It doesn’t matter about reading the first book that much about from Elizabeth’s death. I think Godberson could have not described the characters again but it was a good reminder. The ending is very dramatic like the last one. It is very surprising so watch out for that one. Can’t wait for the next one, Envy.
polyachka: So you mentioned how DC Sugarlabs was started
I think his new employer will be glad to know that
So what do you think of my new shirt?
Natural gas grills on the higher end of cost. The mechanical part of this grill make it larger and more complex. The Natural gas grills are meant to be hooked up to your home line. Typically these types of grills start at about $300.
Yes, I like being in both worlds, of business and creativity. I suppose they go hand-in-hand in many ways, but the common thread of thought seems to be that people "can't" be both. Oh, but then again, who wants to be one-dimensional?
George and Sophia meet again and they fell in love.
Lots of talking that my swirly mind can't keep track of, then he's introducing blogger Joy Renee from Joystory. She sweeps onstage as my heart does a flippy flop.
I keep the pattern cards sorted into deck boxes. Right now, I've got them in one box for the official patterns, one for "borders, bands and lines", one for "grids" (patterns that are best done on a grid), and two for anything else. But I'm going to have to expand the grids to a second and the "catch all" to a third before long. Right now, all the patterns in the boxes are sorted alphabetically by first letter, but that's not going to stay that way for too long.
Before the hand cramps started, I was stitching on this wonderfully sweet design by Beth Twist! It is an exclusive design available only to those who participate in her simple rules at Heartstrings Around the World (even though I had to read it several times for it to register). I did change out a few colors since I did not have all the required threads and I was so anxious to start on it! No patience here! I had a little trouble at first with wondering about my color choices, my fabric choice and a herd of frogs invaded my time. Once the frogs left and I got some color stitched into the piece, it has become a fun piece to work on.
The big breakthrough came in the wee hours of October 22 when administration officials -- including Treasury Secretary Lawrence Summers -- and key Republican lawmakers reached a compromise after negotiating for days behind closed doors. The White House then lifted its longstanding veto threat.
Instead, I had a life of travel, of constant uprooting, of my formative and developmental years laced with culture after culture. I grew up transitioning from country to country that had starkly different political viewpoints, different caste systems, different streets, different smells, different laws, different educational systems, and different styles of general life. I had no stability, where she had an endless string of it.
This week Dee Jackson is our host! Dee is challenging us to " All About Me". Use what you love and what makes you happy!! Use your favorite colors, stamps, layout, and embellishments! Whatever ROCKS your world! We would love to see what you create!
The serpent, symbolic of Life, seen in the snaking of equinox sunset light down the pyramid of Chichen Itza, is common to many archaic worlds: medical science’s caduceus, Hermes the messenger to the gods, and the Garden of Eden would not be the same without him.
We walked on into the Coca Cola area - you remember, the bourne from which, according to the guide books, no traveler returns.
jenney :)
First of all, I wish that Parks had managed to curtail some of leading man Avery Brooks’ penchant for theatrical acting. I realize that “SOLOMON NORTHRUP’S ODYSSEY” was the actor’s first job in screen acting, but traces of hammy acting – a leftover from years of success on the stage – remained in his performance. Come to think of it, I could say the same about a handful of cast members in minor roles, including Janet League as Eliza, the slave mother who ended up losing her children during the journey to Louisiana and eventually, her mind. I had no problems with the movie’s slow pacing, which I felt perfectly reflected its setting of antebellum Louisiana circa 1841-53. But there were times when the pacing threatened to slow down to a halt, especially in scenes that featured montages of Solomon’s duties on the Epps plantation.
No I didn’t forget. I had the pics ready and everything. Honest. It was just a nutso day. I had a 6 tier wedding cake to deliver and put final touches on…also 4 extra cakes, each a different flavor..carrot with pecan cream cheese filling, strawberry w/vanilla, chocolate with peanut butter filling and lemon w/vanilla.
Today's review is going to be all about a product that I have been loving a lot lately. This is the L'Occitane Almond Shower Oil which is my absolute favorite product to use in the shower. Keep reading if you want to know what I think about this product :)
Chino's 30 waist 34 leg (hard to get, it appears every man in Leicester is short) - Jack
Grade: C
A COSTLY ASS
with pure white stars
Faversham has its own swimming pool trust. Despite its charitable status it has been heavily subsidised by Swale Borough Council.
“Wen has one year left (in his term),” said a Chinese state banker who asked not to be identified because of the sensitivity of the topic. “This is a task for the next generation of leaders. It cannot be accomplished within one year.”
(Photo by Michael D.D. White)
And they had parties.
Voting day can also be made a mandatory national holiday, so that citizens have no excuses for not turning out to vote, and companies have no excuses for remaining open. Mobile voting centers can be setup to aid elderly or infirmed voters with the process, and those who are absolutely unable to participate may get a waiver through an extensive process of unenrollment, that would need to be re-submitted for every election.
Coraline is a disturbing story of a young girl who discovers a parallel world in her new family home. The book is filled with strange and eerie images, and a threatening atmosphere of foreboding. The book contains several illustrations by Dave Mckean, Gaiman’s longtime collaborator, which represent the characters and action beautifully.
Moon looked at Black Pudding and smiled.
That organization is now 375 years old and made up to 21% of troops in 2008 for a combined total of all forces in Iraq and Afghanistan. This is pretty amazing for a force that was created to secure the home front and national disasters.
The experience of Eoin Reddan will compliment the growing maturity of Jonathan Sexton, who has once again proven that he is one of the top fly-halves in the Northern Hemisphere.
Indian migrant, Navjot Dhaliwal is a case in point. She hopes her two daughters pursue triple degrees at university because doing a double-degree is “very common.”
Pussycat – Mississippi
A pain in the heart no stake could rival
(Yes. Nokia). The phone company was an offshoot of the rubber company's cable division.
Witnesses said the attack hit an old section of the campus of Bayero University in Kano. Abubakar Jibril, a spokesman for Nigeria’s national emergency management agency, said at least three explosions had struck on and around the campus, and that sporadic gunfire was continuing on Sunday morning.
100 g (4 oz) powdered sugar
8 together
It’s also important to note that Courtney’s degree from Columbia University isn’t in anything horse-related; instead she majored in literature. Beezie Madden – who added a team gold medal at the 2011 Pan American Games in show jumping yesterday – has a two-year associate’s degree in liberal arts from Southern Seminary Junior College. Dressage professional and Olympic hopeful Lauren Sprieser has a degree in public policy and urban planning from Sarah Lawrence College. And, finally, Madden’s fellow Olympic show jumper Peter Wylde has a degree in history from Tufts University and once said of the experience, “I spent time with interesting people whom I knew I would not be as likely to meet after school when I went back to riding full time.”
Those heading out to the Tres Maria islands have found their share of Yellowfin Tuna in the 60 to 80 lb range and for this time of the year, that ain´t bad, just remember to stay outside the twelve mile limit and all will be fine. There is blue water at Isabel Island and there are also Dorado in the area. A little surprising, but a nice surprise. This means it is just a matter of time before we see them moving in and we should have Dorado before the end of April, maybe sooner so cross your fingers.
Why are you planting a new church in Atlanta?
I have some thoughts about how I'll be transforming this space in the future to actually make it usable. But until then, I'm happy!
When I hail a cab, I never know what kind of person I will encounter. Thanks to my husband, I am now open to finding out. Small talk can easily turn into something more – spiritual, fun, educational, enlightening, challenging…. You just don’t know how something will turn out or what the take away is. But there is always something to every meeting. There is always a reason, if only a connection.
And please, don't make us beg. Haven't we embarrassed ourselves enough?!
AAP said:
What’s the best retirement planning software to help you achieve your retirement goals? Most of the retirement planning finance software is very simple to use, and offers a clear cut formula to mapping out your retirement plan-something most people don’t do until too late.
Having grown up with great respect for GE thanks to stories my grandfather shared with us about his days working for the company and even meeting GE spokesman-at-the-time Ronald Reagan during a company event, I am saddened at GE’s leadership evolution. This corporation is now the poster child of corporate welfare and crony capitalism.
El Submarino is made from two basic components. First, you have your tall glass of steaming-hot milk. Then you have your bar of rich, delicious chocolate. You drop your bar of chocolate in the milk, it melts, and then you stir it in. The result is a South American Hot Chocolate that tastes so good is should be illegal.
Today there is a brand new challenge at the blog of Artjourney. I had so much fun in the last challenge that I want to enter in this challenge again. Allthough I didn't win the challenge..my tag was shown and mentioned in the winners post. I'm so proud of that and thank them for it!
Vintage China doll head, Dresden, silver glass glitter mini skelly,
Sew a 1/4" seam. Open seam allowance. Finger press to refold middle.
Monday, August 27th–I was sick.
And I (Leesa aka The Navy Wife) scavenged around and went head on by recycling the dress made from crape paper from one of the kids birthday parties. All the matting on this and what I printed the images onto is all book covers and old manilla folders from Dylans' books and school stuff last year that I just distressed with my inks. And the ribbon on the skirt waist came from a birthday pressie wrapping.
Assist with the preparation of financial statements on a weekly, periodic and annual basis for the accounting management team
II Samuel 8:15
We brought the desk out and bought some new sitting area furniture.
She did not seem happy at all and was been dragged away!
Stamps: Inkadinkado Fairies
You should visit an esthetician for acne treatments if your acne is relatively mild and you need guidance to decide upon the best skin care products that would not aggravate your acne or clog up your pores. Estheticians would provide you with facials that would help you treat acne breakouts which are non inflammatory along with blackheads, as they can extract or cleanse out these blemishes
FYI: She like the butt sex. Oodles and oodles of butt sex. In the butt. Like, for her birthday last year, Mr. Pickle got her a jackhammer for the butt sex, since he was physically unable to keep up with her needs. So your descriptions should probably discuss butt sex.
My third R is my children. Before I got pregnant, I worried that having children would mean I’d never write again. This was definitely true in the early days when they were very little, but having them made me prioritize writing and find a way to make it fit. Now that they’re a bit older and I’m able to have more time to write, my time with them is essential for getting out of my head and putting real life into perspective. I’d be insufferable without them.
I bet these fees are only going to get more "convenient" now that Ticketmaster and Live Nation are going to merge. It only makes sense, now that the concert promoters are merging with the ticket sellers. Unless the DOJ comes in to save us from this incredible convenience (please?).
I'm immediately reminded of the discussion over on Boak & Bailey a while back about Burton Ale, and the thesis that this once-popular style of dark, strong sweet beer is not in fact extinct but merely travelling incognito, under names such as "winter warmer" and "strong ale". I think we may have a contender here, or at least an easy reference point for Statesiders looking for a Burton Ale example.
Audrey is definitely experiencing the ups and downs of sisterhood. She can be totally enjoying Abigail one minute, then fending her off the next. She does not want Abigail around her creations. We're trying to teach her to give Abigail a toy to play with to distract her. But more often than not all we hear is, "Abby, no! Mom, come get Abby, she's getting my stuff!" A couple of times we've caught her dragging Abby away by the pant legs (sooo funny!)
In the absence of any rationale or even words for the tragedy that took my friends' lives last weekend half a world away in northeastern Spain, I supposed, coming here, that I could write who they were, so you may recognize them in people you treasure and thereby make my friends that much more immortal.
Your Traditional Company has only ONE core process – the Budget. You are just part of the expenses and all the guff about our people is propaganda.
In A Hot Coma would continue to incur line-up changes throughout most of their existence, but did stabilize themselves for a while with Jerome Brish, Richard and Gerard LaValliere, Guy Hoffman and a promising young keyboard player named Jill Kossoris. When Jill decided to leave the group after a couple years to form her own band, The Shivvers, the remainder of In A Hot Coma morphed into The Haskels.
Do you think of hand cranks merely as decor (as I suspect Johanna does), akin to wagon wheel chandeliers, beer barrel foot rests, or the much maligned-for-good-reason sewing machine lamp -- yesterday's invaluable tool/today's kitsch conversation piece?
The Postmistress by Sarah Blake (TLC Tours)
“A record of my feeling, that I live, that I breathe. My poems were that, and hence: hymns of gratitude. And at the same time, I was conscious of misfortune, of being injured. And nothing in me was spontaneous, but under control of the will.”
The easiest and best way to get stains out of your diapers is to lay them in the sun when wet/damp. The sun is a natural bleach, and it is harmless to your diapers. Just place the interior, or stained side of your diapers facing the sunlight. This is also an economical way to dry your diapers, as it saves money on the electricity required to run your dryer.
worship and thanksgiving (Jonah 2:9). The next thing that happened is simply
How I love this Chandler print! I think the Sis Boom Meghan pattern is perfect for featuring this fabric so that you can see the full print. Love it. And this dress looks way better in person. I think my background is making me look like I don't have a waist. I do! I promise! I actually think this is a very flattering pattern. I am so very hard to fit and it is just perfect at the top and hips. Love it.
The Mater and ISAAC charters are all run by Academica, Florida’s largest charter-school management company. Academica’s president, Fernando Zulueta, said the deadlines for both charter approval and grant approval are close together, forcing schools to use the same enrollment estimates in both applications. But the final grant amount may be lowered based on lower enrollment, as in ISAAC’s case, he said.
Let there be no doubt, I will oppose Leanne's leftism, but at least I will have a principal to oppose if Leanne is elected party leader, rather than the wishy washy nothing that the other candidates seem to be offering.
That thrill of standing at the rail is as powerful for kids as it is for adults. As such, we, along with a couple hundred other families, dragged our kids out of bed before sunrise this past Saturday morning to go have breakfast with the horses. Once we got there, Pip and Polly dutifully ate their eggs and biscuits and then reveled in trolling around the collection area by the rail, alternately watching the horses and watching the other kids watching the horses. After a while, we decided to take a walk through the stables to see what else was happening, and during that walk Pip gave me another of his ongoing lessons about teaching, learning, and the education of a child.
* Paper Smooches stamp suggestions (Falling For You, Spiffy Scooters)
That alternate reality, while admittedly elusive and apparently distant from our general perception of our daily lives, does exist in a very real way, and connecting to it as we did, even though most times only briefly, demonstrates the power and strength in the human equation–YOU + ME = US. This equation applies to all of humanity and to every spirit born into this world. The infinite number of ways it can manifest in the physical universe is evidenced in the history of human cultures in every corner of the earth. Somewhere in the maelstrom of human history, philosophy, and spiritual longings, since the first humans walked upright as conscious beings, exists the union of you and me.
Look at what St. Francis of Assisi says about the Eucharist: ““O admirable heights and sublime lowliness! O sublime humility! O humble sublimity! That the Lord of the universe, God and the Son of God, so humbles Himself that for our salvation He hides Himself under the little form of bread! Look, brothers, at the humility of God and pour out your hearts before Him! Humble yourselves, as well, that you may be exalted by Him.”
This is a beautiful book. The layout, photos and even the scalloped page edges are all lovely and feminine and oh so French. I've visited Miette and the bakery itself is bright and charming and everything I've bought there has been delicious. Unfortunately the recipes from the Miette Bakery Cookbook did not yield the results that I was hoping for when I bought this book.
Presuming that the motion to annul the rules is a tame affair, we will still have to contend with a Bill being moved by Salman bhai to repeal the Tamil Nadu Legislative Council or the upper house of the Tamil Nadu Legislature. 'Amma' Jayalalitha, had promised to repeal the same when she came to power last year since the DMK govt. had allegedly created the same for the sole purpose of filling it with its acolytes. If the DMKs MPs decide to 'storm' the well of the House, we could be in a spot of trouble with the Copyright (Amendment) Bill, 2010.
These are voices from your schools and communities. What are your opinions? Join in the conversation by commenting below!
Other than that, I've just been trying to keep sane with all of the sickness, crying, mess and general malaise going on in our house.
For where your treasure is, there your heart will be also."
Luke 21:36 Watch ye therefore, and pray always, that ye may be accounted worthy to escape all these things that shall come to pass, and to stand before the Son of man.
by Polly Teale
Honestly I am glad I learned it the hard way, because now I know and I take more care of what I eat and how much water I drink, especially on long run days. I don't ever want to feel like that again, if I can help it...
This one is from the producer who brought us Pirates of the Caribbean. It stars a very hot and buff Jake Gyllenhaal, as a free spirited Persian prince who finds himself battling an evil conspiracy to unleash the sands of time. The prince must join forces with a mysterious princess from a mystical empire to protect an ancient dagger - the key to releasing the magical sands. If the dagger gets into the wrong hands, it can be used to turn back time and rule the world.
So every time I look at my list of requests, I squirm a little bit, and so far I haven't known what I was going to blog about until I opened the window. Today is no different, but seeing as me and the hubby have just finished a marathon Gavin & Stacy watchathon, I figured saucy seaside postcards was a good bet. For those of you unfamiliar with Gavin & Stacy, it's a British sitcom partly based in Barry, or Barry Island to be exact. Barry Island is about half an hour away from the Kair of Diff (er, Cardiff), and isn't actually an island at all, but it does have a beach. It used to have a funfair, but sadly that closed a few years ago.
like the sparkles from the water itself
L = Late,80 %
SPACKLE!~just for you Emilee! :-D
Today I will...
This might not be particularly interesting to anybody but me!! But here’s my schedule for the next several weeks anyway:
But whatever the Axtli's touch had done to her, it hadn't crippled her. She met his eyes, face unreadable but far from impassive. Then Rel felt the pressure against his hands lift as she turned her gaze on the darkness. His fingers tingled, not unpleasantly, as the bubble-skin edge of her Warding dropped through them onto the Axtli. Voice low, she said, "I've got it. Move Dora."
I left the paper after 15 months to have more time to take care of mom. Julie told me she was disappointed I was leaving, but for the next year and a year we exchanged brief, intermittent emails.
Russia will take out NATO’s missile defense system in Eastern Europe if the U.S. implements a missile shield, Chief of General Staff Nikolai Makarov warned on Thursday.
Add the rest of the ingredients and stir well.
The ultimate goal, of course, being publication of the work I enjoy writing: my essays, my fiction, my poetry…and it’s coming…I have to believe it’s coming.
to experience what I like to think of as a frontlash with regards to balsamic vinegar, which is, objectively, delicious. (This also happened with portobello mushrooms.) Honey is good when you cook with it. And the pear thing, that was a lame new year's resolution. And of course, blue cheese is a super ingredient esp. for contrasting with different textures and tastes, which this recipe did absolutely delightfully.
The first layout class I taught was designed specifically to show how to create subtle background paint techniques using acrylic paints and Glimmer Mist. I used Webster's Pages 'All About Me' range in this class. The students all embraced the paint/ink techniques, even if it was the first time for some!
The reality of SGML allowing such extensibility is a major part of its complexity from the perspective of web browsers.
● Dunayevskaya, ”The Paris Commune: a form of workers’ government”
the robins come each spring in robin time -
million, took the victim to
Then I realized it came from a lot of different places, mostly fear, I had spent a great deal of my time, watching people and one thing I never wanted to be was ‘stereotypical’. I never wanted to be the sister who didn’t have anything to show but how she looked and what she wore, so I avoided that, was frugal and conservative…because believe you me, I knew so many who bought into, ‘Fake it till you make it, look good no matter what…’ also, there was the people I allowed in my head, ‘You don’t need that, or this or the other…’ Never questioned why they felt like that, just accepted it…and one of my biggest fears was to have those I love disapprove of my in some way…didn’t show it, I was a cool as a popsicle in an igloo, but it was still true, because you do know don’t you, that just because folk can’t see, it doesn’t mean it ain’t real…
Can you spot the Bedtime Bus Roll Poster Jenene got me to make in Italian?
If you'll be at market, won't you drop me an e-mail or leave a comment? I'm excited to connect with everyone who will be there. I will participate in Sample Spree and my booth for that is pretty close to the front doors. My market booth number is 2531.
Creep by Jennifer Hillier
Now, Bitter Broom is Sacred to a Deity named Babalu-Aye (bah-bah-LOO ah-YEH). He Is the Yoruban/Nigerian/Afro-Caribbean God of Healing. However, some of you may feel more comfortable working with His Catholic guise, Saint Lazarus. Of course, if you feel more comfortable working with another God of Healing, especially physical healing, then please feel free.
And the paper statements that come in, will just get tucked into the handy tab's folder pocket until it's paid and sent back out!
Enough so I'm picked last in gym for any activity has anything to do with running, climbing ropes, or propelling oneself over a horse. Enough so I've hears people refer to me as plump, as if being lickened to a vine-ripe tomato is some kind of compliment. Enough so family friends, upon comparing me to my skinny siblings, raise their eyebrows as high as McDonald's golden arches.' (p24)
sunday i took it easy all day and today as well. my plan is to stay home the rest of the week and rest --- except that i need to go into work tomorrow or wednesday to give my resignation notice....i received my letter of conditional employment offer (pending pee test, call to current employer and background check) and they plan to announce my employment at the city commission meeting NEXT WEEK so i need to get my ducks in a row stat.
1/2 cup chopped onion
MS: They’re easy to play—very accessible. It allows us to let go and do. You have something that you can just hit and there’s a sound. If have to learn a new instrument your musical ideas just stop.
So the answer is pretty straightforward, we need to do a muscle biopsy from these very painful muscles. Yes I know, not something we would be looking forward to, however, as this is the place where we can find the virus, we will be more than happy to help to find this virus, which is causing this severe and very disabling disease, in our mitochondria.
I am so excited to find my The Greeting Farm rubber stamps order in the mailbox this week. I ordered a few pieces after working with one of their digis for a DT card I made for the 2 Sisters Challenge Blog.
Isn't this wonderful, sorry but I am so excited by this huge table. It measures 50" L x 31" W. Glass top. I bought a new matt to cover it so I won't scratch or chip it. The drawers are wonderful. 10 drawers more then I had in my previous table. I can't wait to get it all done with the stuff I need close.
Philosophers, theologians and naturalists were troubled by the cruelty and br00tality exhibited by organisms such as ichneumonid wasps and cuckoos. How could god create creatures that are so cruel if he is benevolent? Charles Darwin himself wrote:
Had another letter from the hospital today and I have got to go there on Monday for a talk about the chemotherapy side of treatment, 2, 45minute sessions with the chemo nurses, more questions I can have answered, maybe even more that I will ask?
In the case of todays dish, this is exactly what I've done. Paalo does have a sweet tooth, so dessert is always a winner. In this tart I've used my buttery, sweet shortcrust and teemed it with an irresistible frangipane upon which I've nestled wedges of ripe fig.
And there ain't no place in (Belfast) for
Globalists fear Greece could exit single currency and stage a miraculous economic recovery
Ink is a matter of personal preference. I buy Winsor-Newton's black India ink with a spider on the box. It is pretty pricey, but it is the perfect consistency. Some artists buy cheaper, watery ink and leave the bottle open for days so it thickens. I don't have the time or the coordination to leave a bottle of ink sitting open in my room. I have to have deep black on the page... some artists photohop it to look darker.
(I've tried it, too. The writing out of order thing. All I ended up with was a mess that didn't make sense, and I never did finish that novel. Didn't even get close. This is not a skill I possess.)
